{"Drug abuse first aid": {"Symptoms": ["Abnormal pupil size", "Agitation", "Convulsions", "Death", "Delusional or paranoid behavior", "Difficulty breathing", "Drowsiness", "Hallucinations", "Nausea and vomiting", "Nonreactive pupils (pupils that do not change size when exposed to light)", "Staggering or unsteady gait (ataxia)", "Sweating or extremely dry, hot skin", "Tremors", "Unconsciousness (coma)", "Violent or aggressive behavior", "Abdominal cramping", "Agitation", "Cold sweat", "Convulsions", "Delusions", "Depression", "Diarrhea", "Hallucinations", "Nausea and vomiting", "Restlessness", "Shaking", "Death"], "Prevention": "A variety of resources is available for treating substance abuse and chemical dependency.See also:Alcoholism - resources, Drug dependence - resources. ", "description": "Drug abuse is the misuse or overuse of any medication or drug, including alcohol. This article discusses first aid for drug overdose and withdrawal.", "Causes": "An overdose of narcotics can cause sleepiness, slowed breathing, and even unconsciousness.Uppers (stimulants) produce excitement, increased heart rate, and rapid breathing. Downers (depressants) do just the opposite.Mind-altering drugs are called hallucinogens. They include LSD, PCP (angel dust), and other street drugs. Using such drugs may cause paranoia, hallucinations, aggressive behavior, or extreme social withdrawal.Cannabis-containing drugs such as marijuana may cause relaxation, impaired motor skills, and increased appetite.Legal prescription drugs are sometimes taken in higher than recommended amounts to achieve a feeling other than the therapeutic effects for which they were intended. This may lead to serious side effects.The use of any of the above mentioned drugs may result in impaired judgment and decision-making skills."}, "Dental sealants": {"description": "Dentists can apply dental sealants to the back teeth (molars and premolars) to help prevent cavities. Dental sealants are a thin resin coating that covers the grooves of molars. "}, "Dry skin - self-care": {"description": "You can get dry skin anywhere on your body. But it commonly shows up on the hands, feet, arms, and lower legs.", "Causes": "Dry skin can be caused by:Cold, dry winter air, Furnaces that heat the air and remove moisture, Hot, dry air in desert environments, Air conditioners that cool the air and remove moisture, Taking long, hot baths or showers frequently, Washing your hands often, Some soaps and detergents, Skin conditions, such as eczema and psoriasis, Certain medicines (both topical and oral), Aging, during which skin gets thinner and produces less natural oil . "}, "Diphtheria": {"description": "Diphtheria is an acute infection caused by the bacteria Corynebacterium diphtheriae.", "Possible Complications": "The most common complication is inflammation of the heart muscle (myocarditis). The nervous system is also frequently and severely affected, which may result in temporary paralysis.The diphtheria toxin can also damage the kidneys.There can also be an allergic response to the antitoxin.", "Symptoms": ["Bluish coloration of the skin", "Bloody, watery drainage from nose", "Breathing problems, including difficulty breathing, fast breathing,\u00a0high-pitched breathing sound\u00a0(stridor)", "Chills", "Croup-like (barking) cough", "Drooling (suggests airway blockage is about to occur)", "Fever", "Hoarseness", "Painful swallowing", "Skin sores (usually seen in tropical areas)", "Sore throat (may range from mild to severe) "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam and look inside your mouth. This may reveal a gray to black covering (pseudomembrane) in the throat, enlarged lymph glands, and swelling of the neck or larynx.Tests used may include:Gram stain or throat culture to identify the diphtheria bacteria\r\n, Toxin assay (to detect the presence of the toxin made by the bacteria)\u00a0, Electrocardiogram (ECG). ", "Treatment": "If the health care provider thinks you have diphtheria, treatment\u00a0will likely\u00a0be started right away, even before test results come back.Diphtheria antitoxin is given as a shot into a muscle or through an IV (intravenous line). The infection is then treated with antibiotics, such as penicillin and erythromycin.You\u00a0may need to stay in the hospital while getting the antitoxin. Other treatments may include:Fluids by IV, Oxygen, Bed rest, Heart monitoring, Insertion of a breathing tube, Correction of airway blockages. \u00a0Persons without symptoms who carry diphtheria should be treated with antibiotics.", "Prevention": "If you have been in close contact with a person who has diphtheria, contact your health care provider right away. Ask whether you need antibiotics to prevent getting diphtheria.Routine childhood immunizations and adult boosters prevent the disease. \r\n Anyone who has come into contact with\u00a0an infected person should\u00a0get an immunization or booster shot against diphtheria, if they have not already received it. Protection from the vaccine lasts only 10 years. So it is important for adults to get a booster vaccine every 10 years. The booster is called tetanus-diphtheria (Td). (The shot also has vaccine medicine for an infection called tetanus.) \r\n ", "Causes": "Diphtheria spreads through respiratory droplets (such as\u00a0from a cough or sneeze) of an infected person or someone who carries the bacteria but has no symptoms.The bacteria most commonly infects\u00a0your nose and throat. The throat infection causes a gray to black, tough, fiber-like covering, which can block\u00a0your airways. In some cases, diphtheria infects your skin first and causes\u00a0skin lesions.Once you are infected, the bacteria make dangerous substances called toxins. The toxins spread through your bloodstream to other organs, such as the heart and brain,\u00a0and cause damage.Because of widespread vaccination (immunization) of children, diphtheria is now rare in many parts of the world. Risk factors for diphtheria\u00a0include crowded environments, poor hygiene, and lack of immunization."}, "Diazepam overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Bluish-colored lips and fingernails", "Blurred vision", "Confusion", "Depression", "Dizziness", "Double vision", "Drowsiness", "Excitability", "Hiccups", "Labored breathing", "Lack of alertness (stupor)", "Rapid side-to-side movement of the eyes (nystagmus)", "Rash", "Stomach upset", "Tiredness", "Tremor", "Uncoordinated movement", "Weakness"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222. "}, "Developmental milestones record - 18 months": {"description": "Skills and growth milestones of 18-month-old children describes the physical and mental development that is expected for this age."}, "Delirium": {"description": "Delirium is sudden severe confusion due to rapid changes in brain function that occur with physical or mental illness.", "Possible Complications": "Loss of ability to function or care for self, Loss of ability to interact, Progression to stupor or coma, Side effects of medications used to treat the disorder. ", "Symptoms": ["Changes in alertness (usually more alert in the morning, less alert at night)", "Changes in feeling (sensation) and perception", "Changes in level of consciousness or awareness", "Changes in movement (for example, may be slow moving or hyperactive)", "Changes in sleep patterns, drowsiness", "Confusion (disorientation) about time or place", "Decrease in short-term memory and recall", "Disorganized thinking, such as talking in a way that doesn't make sense", "Emotional or personality changes, such as anger, agitation, depression, irritability, overly happy", "Incontinence", "Movements triggered by changes in the nervous system", "Problem concentrating"], "Exams and Tests": "The following tests may have abnormal results:An exam of the nervous system (neurologic examination), including tests of feeling (sensation), thinking (cognitive function), and motor function, Neuropsychological studies . The following tests may also be done:Blood and urine tests, Chest x-ray, Cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) analysis (spinal tap), Electroencephalogram (EEG), Head CT scan, Head MRI scan, Mental status test . ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to control or reverse the cause of the symptoms. Treatment depends on the condition causing delirium. The person may need to stay in the hospital for a short time.Stopping or changing medications that worsen confusion, or that are not necessary, may improve mental function. After asking about your medical history, your doctor will discuss medicines and substances that can worsen confusion, such as alcohol.Disorders that contribute to confusion should be treated. These may include:Anemia, Decreased oxygen (hypoxia), Heart failure, High carbon dioxide levels (hypercapnia), Infections, Kidney failure, Liver failure, Nutritional disorders, Psychiatric conditions (such as depression), Thyroid disorders . Treating medical and mental disorders often greatly improves mental function.Medicines may be needed to control aggressive or agitated behaviors. These are usually started at very low dosages and adjusted as needed.Some people with delirium may benefit from hearing aids, glasses, or cataract surgery.Other treatments that may be helpful:Behavior modification to control unacceptable or dangerous behaviors, Reality orientation to reduce disorientation. ", "Prevention": "Treating the conditions that cause delirium can reduce its risk. In hospitalized patients, avoiding sedatives, prompt treatment of metabolic disorders and infections, and using reality orientation programs will reduce the risk of delirium in those at high risk.", "Causes": "Delirium is most often caused by physical or mental illness, and is usually temporary and reversible. Many disorders cause delirium. Often, the conditions are ones that do not allow the brain to get oxygen or other substances.Causes include:Alcohol or sedative drug withdrawal, Drug abuse, Electrolyte or other body chemical disturbances, Infections such as urinary tract infections or pneumonia (more likely in people who already have brain damage from stroke or dementia), Poisons, Surgery . "}, "Dry hair": {"description": "Dry hair is hair that does not have enough moisture and oil to maintain its normal sheen and texture.", "Causes": "Anorexia nervosa, Excessive washing, or using harsh soaps or alcohols, Excessive blow-drying, Dry air (environmental dryness), Menkes kinky hair syndrome, Malnutrition (for example, kwashiorkor disease), Underactive parathyroid (hypoparathyroidism), Underactive thyroid (hypothyroidism). "}, "Down syndrome": {"description": "Down syndrome is a genetic condition in which a person has 47 chromosomes instead of the usual 46. ", "Possible Complications": "Airway blockage during sleep, Compression injury of the spinal cord, Endocarditis, Eye problems, Frequent ear infections and increased risk of other infections, Hearing loss, Heart problems, Gastrointestinal blockage, Weakness of the back bones at the top of the neck. ", "Symptoms": ["Decreased muscle tone at birth", "Excess skin at the nape of the neck", "Flattened nose", "Separated joints between the bones of the skull (sutures)", "Single crease in the palm of the hand", "Small ears", "Small mouth", "Upward slanting eyes", "Wide, short hands with short fingers", "White spots on the colored part of the eye (Brushfield spots)", "Impulsive behavior", "Poor judgment", "Short attention span", "Slow learning", "Birth defects involving the heart, such as an atrial septal defect or ventricular septal defect", "Dementia may be seen", "Eye problems, such as cataracts (most children with Down syndrome need glasses)", "Early and massive vomiting, which may be a sign of a gastrointestinal blockage, such as esophageal atresia and duodenal atresia", "Hearing problems, probably caused by regular ear infections", "Hip problems and risk of dislocation", "Long-term (chronic) constipation problems", "Sleep apnea (because the mouth, throat, and airway are narrowed in children with Down syndrome)", "Teeth that appear later than normal and in a location that may cause problems with chewing", "Underactive thyroid (hypothyroidism)"], "Exams and Tests": "A doctor can often make an initial diagnosis of Down syndrome at birth based on how the baby looks. The doctor may hear a heart murmur when listening to the baby's chest with a stethoscope.A blood test can be done to check for the extra chromosome and confirm the diagnosis.\r\n Other tests that may be done include:Echocardiogram to check for heart defects (usually done soon after birth), ECG, X-rays of the chest and gastrointestinal tract. Persons with Down syndrome need to be closely screened for certain medical conditions. They should have:Eye exam every year during infancy, Hearing tests every 6\u00a0to 12 months, depending on age, Dental exams every 6 months, X-rays of the upper or cervical spine between ages 3\u00a0and 5 years, Pap smears and pelvic exams beginning during puberty or by age 21, Thyroid testing every 12 months. ", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for Down syndrome. A child born with a gastrointestinal blockage may need major surgery immediately after birth. Certain heart defects may also require surgery.When breast-feeding, the baby should be well supported and fully awake. The baby may have some leakage because of poor tongue control. However, many infants with Down syndrome can successfully breast-feed.Obesity can become a problem for older children and adults. Getting plenty of activity and avoiding high-calorie foods are important. Before beginning sports activities, the child's neck and hips should be examined.Behavioral training can help people with Down syndrome and their families deal with the frustration, anger, and compulsive behavior that often occur. Parents and caregivers should learn to help a person with Down syndrome deal with frustration. At the same time, it is important to encourage independence.Adolescent females and women with Down syndrome are usually able to get pregnant. There is an increased risk of sexual abuse and other types of abuse in both males and females. It is important for those with Down syndrome to:Be taught about pregnancy and taking the proper precautions, Learn to advocate for themselves in difficult situations, Be in a safe environment. If the person has any heart defects or other heart problems, antibiotics may need to be prescribed to prevent a heart infection called endocarditis.Special education and training is offered in most communities for children with delays in mental development. Speech therapy may help improve language skills. Physical therapy may teach movement skills. Occupational therapy may help with feeding and performing tasks. Mental health care can help both parents and the child manage mood or behavior problems. Special educators are also often needed.", "Prevention": "Experts recommend genetic counseling for persons with a family history of Down syndrome who wish to have a baby.A woman's risk of having a child with Down syndrome increases as she gets older. The risk is significantly higher among women age 35 and older.Couples who already have a baby with Down syndrome have an increased risk of having another baby with the condition.Tests such as nuchal translucency ultrasound, amniocentesis, or chorionic villus sampling can be done on a fetus during the first few months of pregnancy to check for Down syndrome.", "Causes": "In most cases, Down syndrome occurs when there is an extra copy of chromosome 21. This form of Down syndrome is called Trisomy 21. The extra chromosome causes problems with the way the body and brain develop.Down syndrome is one of the most common causes of human birth defects."}, "Dizziness": {"Prevention": "If you have a cold, the flu, or other viral illness, drink plenty of fluids to prevent getting dehydrated.", "description": "Vertigo is a feeling that you are spinning or moving, or that the world is spinning around you. See also: Vertigo-associated disorders", "Causes": "Light-headedness occurs when your brain does not get enough blood. This may occur if:You have a sudden drop in blood pressure, Your body does not have enough water (is dehydrated) because of vomiting, diarrhea, fever, and other conditions, You get up too quickly after sitting or lying down (this is more common in older people). Light-headedness may also occur if you have the flu, low blood sugar, a cold, or allergies.More serious conditions that can lead to light-headedness include:Heart problems, such as a heart attack or abnormal heart beat, Stroke, Bleeding inside the body, Shock (extreme drop in blood pressure). If any of these serious disorders is present, you will usually also have symptoms like chest pain, a feeling of a racing heart, loss of speech, change in vision, or other symptoms.Vertigo may be due to:Benign positional vertigo, a spinning feeling that occurs when you move your head, Labyrinthitis, a viral infection of the inner ear that usually follows a cold or flu, Meniere's disease, a common inner ear problem. Other causes of light-headedness or vertigo may include:Use of certain medications, Stroke, Multiple sclerosis, Seizures, Brain tumor, Bleeding in the brain. "}, "Delayed ejaculation": {"description": "Delayed ejaculation is a medical condition in which a male cannot ejaculate, either during intercourse or by manual stimulation with a partner. Ejaculation is when semen is released from the penis.", "Possible Complications": "If the problem is not addressed and treated, the following may occur:Avoidance of sexual contact, Inhibited sexual desire, Marital stress, Sexual dissatisfaction. If you and your partner are trying to get pregnant, sperm may have to be collected using other methods because of the lack of ejaculation.", "Exams and Tests": "Stimulating the penis with a vibrator or other device may determine whether you have a physical (often nervous system) problem. A nervous system (neurological) examination may reveal other nerve problems that are associated with delayed ejaculation.", "Causes": "Most men ejaculate within a few minutes of starting to thrust during intercourse. Men with delayed ejaculation may be unable to ejaculate (for example, during intercourse), or may only be able to ejaculate with great effort after having intercourse for a long time (for example, 30 to 45 minutes).Delayed ejaculation can have psychological or physical causes.Common psychological causes include:Religious background that makes the person view sex as sinful, Lack of attraction for a partner, Conditioning caused by a habit of unusual masturbation, Traumatic events (such as being discovered masturbating or having illicit sex, or learning one's partner is having an affair). Some factors, such as anger toward the partner, may be involved.Physical causes may include:Blockage of the ducts that semen passes through , Use of certain drugs (such as prozac, mellaril, and guanethidine), Nervous system diseases, such as a stroke or nerve damage to the spinal cord or back. ", "Prevention": "Having a healthy attitude about your sexuality and genitals helps prevent delayed ejaculation. Realize that you cannot force yourself to have a sexual response, just as you cannot force yourself to go to sleep or to perspire. The harder you try to have a certain sexual response, the harder it becomes to respond.To reduce the pressure, absorb yourself in the pleasure of the moment. Do not worry about whether or when you will ejaculate. Your partner should create a relaxed atmosphere, and should not pressure you about whether or not you have ejaculated. Openly discuss any fears or anxieties, such as fear of pregnancy or disease, with your partner.", "Treatment": "If you have never ejaculated through any form of stimulation (such as wet dreams, masturbation, or intercourse), see a urologist to determine if the problem has a physical cause.If you are able to ejaculate in a reasonable period of time by some form of stimulation, see a therapist who specializes in ejaculation problems. Sex therapy usually includes both partners. The therapist will usually teach you about the sexual response, and how to communicate and guide your partner to provide the right stimulation.Therapy often involves a series of \"homework\" assignments. In the privacy of your home, you and your partner engage in sexual activities that reduce performance pressure and focus on pleasure.Typically, you will not have sexual intercourse for a certain period of time, while you gradually learn to enjoy ejaculation through other types of stimulation.In cases where there is a problem with the relationship or a lack of sexual desire, you may need therapy to improve your relationship and emotional intimacy.Sometimes hypnosis may be a helpful addition to therapy, especially if one partner is not willing to participate in therapy. Trying to self-treat this problem is often not successful.If a medication is believed to be the cause of the problem, discuss other medication options with your health care provider. Never stop taking any medicine without first talking to your health care provider."}, "Deodorant poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Blurred vision", "Breathing difficulty", "Burning pain in the throat", "Collapse", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness)", "Diarrhea (watery, bloody)", "Inability to walk in a normal manner", "Lack of alertness (stupor)", "Low blood pressure", "No urine output", "Rash", "Slurred speech", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Donovanosis (granuloma inguinale)": {"description": "Donovanosis (granuloma inguinale) is a sexually transmitted disease that is rarely seen in the United States.", "Possible Complications": "Genital damage and scarring, Loss of skin color in genital area, Permanent genital swelling due to scarring. ", "Symptoms": ["About half of infected men and women have sores in the anal area.", "Small, beefy-red bumps appear on the genitals or around the anus.", "The skin gradually wears away, and the bumps turn into raised, beefy-red, velvety nodules called granulation tissue. They are usually painless, but they bleed easily if injured.", "The disease slowly spreads and destroys genital tissue.", "Tissue damage may spread to the area where the legs meet the torso. This area is called the inguinal folds.", "The genitals and the skin around them lose skin color."], "Exams and Tests": "Tests that may be done include:Culture of tissue sample (hard to do and not routinely available), Scrapings or punch biopsy of lesion . Laboratory tests, such as those used to detect syphilis, are available only on a research basis for diagnosing donovanosis.", "Treatment": "Antibiotics are used to treat donovanosis. A cure for the condition requires long-term treatment. Most treatment courses run 3 weeks or until the sores have completely healed.A follow-up examination is important because the disease can reappear after it seems to be cured.", "Prevention": "Avoiding all sexual activity is the only absolute way to prevent a sexually transmitted disease such as donovanosis. However, safer sex behaviors may reduce your risk.The proper use of condoms, either the male or female type, greatly decreases the risk of catching a sexually transmitted disease. You need to wear the condom from the beginning to the end of each sexual activity.", "Causes": "Donovanosis (granuloma inguinale) is caused by the bacteria Klebsiella granulomatis. The disease is commonly found in tropical and subtropical areas such as southeast India, Guyana, and New Guinea. However, it can sometimes occur in the United States, typically in the Southeast. There are about 100 cases reported per year in the United States.The disease spreads mostly through vaginal or anal intercourse. Very rarely, it spreads during oral sex.Men are affected more than twice as often as women. Most infections occur in people ages 20 - 40. The disease is rarely seen in children or the elderly."}, "Donath-Landsteiner test": {"description": "The Donath-Landsteiner test is a blood test to detect harmful antibodies related to a rare disorder called paroxysmal cold hemoglobinuria. The antibodies form and destroy red blood cells when the body is exposed to cold temperatures."}, "Dextromethorphan overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing problems -- slow and labored breathing, shallow breathing, no breathing", "Bluish-colored fingernails and lips", "Blurred vision", "Coma", "Constipation", "Convulsions (seizures)", "Drowsiness", "Dizziness", "Hallucinations", "High or low blood pressure", "Muscle spasticity (twitches)", "Nausea", "Raised body temperature (hyperthermia)", "Rapid heartbeat", "Spasms of the stomach and intestines", "Vomiting "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Delivery presentations": {"description": "If your baby is breech, it is not safe to deliver vaginally. If your baby is not in a head -down position after your 36th week, your provider can explain your choices and their risks to help you decide what steps to take next."}, "Dry cell battery poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Decreased mental ability", "Irritation or burns in the mouth", "Muscle cramps", "Slurred speech", "Swelling of the lower legs, ankles, or feet", "Weakness", "Spastic walk", "Spasticity", "Tremor", "Decreased mental ability", "Difficulty sleeping", "Muscle cramps", "Slurred speech", "Weakness in the legs", "Bronchitis", "Headache", "Pneumonia", "Itching skin", "Numbness of the fingers or toes", "Spastic walk", "Severe pain in the mouth", "Collapse", "Inability to breathe due to the throat swelling shut", "Severe pain in the throat", "Severe abdominal pain", "Diarrhea", "Vomiting", "Drooling", "Rapid drop in blood pressure"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Dry mouth during cancer treatment": {"description": "Some cancer treatments and medicines can cause dry mouth. Symptoms you may have include:"}, "Dyscrasias": {"description": "Before modern medicine, it meant an imbalance of four body fluids: blood, bile, lymph, and phlegm."}, "Diverticulitis": {"description": "Diverticulitis occurs when small, bulging sacs or pouches that form on the inner wall of the intestine (diverticula) become inflamed or infected. Most often, these pouches are in the large intestine (colon).", "Possible Complications": "More serious problems that may develop are:Abnormal connections that form between parts of the colon or between the colon and another part of the body (fistula), Hole or tear in the colon (perforation), Narrowed area in the colon (stricture), Pocket filled with pus or infection (abscess) . ", "Symptoms": ["Tenderness, usually in the left lower side of the abdomen", "Bloating or gas", "Fever and chills", "Nausea and vomiting", "Not feeling hungry and not eating "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will examine you. You may need blood tests to see if you have an infection.Other tests that help diagnose diverticulitis may include:CT scan, Ultrasound of the abdomen, X-rays of the abdomen . ", "Treatment": "The treatment of diverticulitis depends on how serious symptom are. Some people may need to be in the hospital, but most of the time the problem can be treated at home.To help with the pain, your doctor may suggest that you:Rest in bed and use a heating pad on your belly., Take pain medicines (ask your doctor which ones you should use)., Drink only fluids for a day or two, and then slowly begin drinking thicker liquids and then eating foods. . The doctor may treat you with antibiotics.After you are better, your doctor will suggest that you add more fiber to your diet. Eating more fiber can help prevent future attacks. If you have bloating or gas, reduce the amount of fiber you eat for a few days.Once these pouches have formed, you will have them for life. Diverticulitis can return, but some health care providers think a high-fiber diet may lessen your chances of a recurrence. ", "Causes": "The formation of pouches or sacs on the intestinal lining is called diverticulosis. It is found in more than half of Americans over age 60. However, no one knows exactly what causes the pouches to form.Eating a low-fiber diet mostly made up of processed foods may be a cause. Constipation and hard stools are more likely when you do not eat enough fiber. Straining to pass stools increases the pressure in the colon or intestines, which may lead to the formation of these pouches.Diverticulitis is caused by small pieces of stool (feces) that become trapped in these pouches, causing infection or inflammation."}, "Daily bowel care program": {"description": "A daily bowel care program can help you avoid embarrassment. Work with your health care provider."}, "Drug-induced tremor": {"description": "Drug-induced tremor is involuntary shaking due to the use of medication. Involuntary means you shake without trying to do so. The shaking occurs when you move or try to hold your arms, hands, or head in a certain position. It is not associated with other symptoms.", "Possible Complications": "Severe tremor can interfere with daily activities, especially fine motor skills such as writing, and other activities such as eating or drinking.", "Symptoms": ["Episodic (occurring in bursts, sometimes about an hour after taking the medication)", "Intermittent (comes and goes with activity, but not always)", "Sporadic (happens on occasion) ", "Occur either with movement or at rest", "Disappear during sleep", "Get worse with voluntary movement and emotional stress ", "Head nodding", "Shaking or quivering sound to the voice"], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor or nurse can make the diagnosis by performing a physical exam and asking questions about your medical and personal history. You will also be asked about the medicines you take.A physical exam will show shaking with movement. There are usually no problems with coordination or thinking.Other tests are usually not needed. However, further tests may be done to rule out other reasons for the tremor. A tremor that occurs when the muscles are relaxed or that affects the legs or coordination may be a sign of another condition, such as Parkinson disease. The speed of the tremor can be an important way to determine its cause.Other causes of tremors may include:Alcohol withdrawal, Cigarette smoking, Hyperthyroidism, Parkinson disease, Pheochromocytoma, Too much caffeine, Wilson disease. Blood tests and imaging studies (such as a CT scan of the head, brain MRI, and x-rays) are usually normal.", "Treatment": "Drug-induced tremor usually goes away when you stop taking the medicine that is causing the shaking.You may not need treatment or changes in the medicine if the tremor is mild and does not interfere with your daily activity.If the benefit of the medicine is greater than the problems caused by the tremor, your doctor may have you try different dosages of the medicine, or you may be prescribed another medicine to treat your condition. In rare cases, a drug such as propranolol may be added to help control the tremor. Do not stop taking any medicine without first talking to your health care provider.", "Prevention": "Always tell your doctor about the medicines you take. Ask your doctor if it is ok to take over-the-counter medicines that contain stimulants or a medicine called theophylline. Theophylline is a drug used to treat wheezing and shortness of breath.Caffeine can cause tremor and make tremor caused by other medicines worse. If you have a tremor, avoid caffeinated drinks such as coffee, tea, and soda. Also avoid other stimulants.", "Causes": "Drug-induced tremor is a simple nervous system and muscle response to certain medicines. Drugs that can cause tremor include the following:Cancer medicines such as thalidomide and cytarabine, Seizure medicines such as valproic acid (Depakote) and sodium valproate (Depakene), Asthma medicines\u00a0such as theophylline and albuterol, Immune suppressing medicines\u00a0such as cyclosporine and tacrolimus, Mood stabilizers such as lithium carbonate, Stimulants such as caffeine\u00a0and amphetamines, Selective serotonin reuptake inhibitors (SSRIs), Tricyclic antidepressants, Heart medicines such as amiodarone, procainamide, and others, Certain antibiotics, Certain antivirals, such as acyclovir and vidarabine, Alcohol, Nicotine, Certain high blood pressure drugs, Epinephrine and norepinephrine, Weight loss medication (tiratricol), Too much thryoid medication (levothyroxine), Tetrabenazine, a medicine to treat excessive movement disorder\u00a0. "}, "Dermatitis herpetiformis": {"description": "Dermatitis herpetiformis is an extremely itchy rash\u00a0consisting of bumps and blisters. The rash is chronic, which means it continues over a long period.", "Possible Complications": "Thyroid disease may be found in many patients with dermatitis herpetiformis. Patients are also more likely to develop certain cancers of the intestines.", "Symptoms": ["Extremely itchy bumps or blisters, most often on the elbows, knees, back, and buttocks", "The rash is usually the same size and shape on both sides", "The rash can look like eczema", "Some patients may have scratch marks instead of blisters "], "Exams and Tests": "A skin biopsy and direct immunofluorescence test of the skin are performed in most cases. Your doctor may also recommend a biopsy of the intestines. Blood tests may be ordered to confirm the diagnosis.", "Treatment": "An antibiotic called dapsone is extremely effective.A strict gluten-free diet will also be recommended to help control the disease. Sticking to this diet may eliminate the need for medications and prevent later complications.Immunosuppressive medications may be used, but are less effective.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention of this disease. People with this condition may be able to prevent complications by avoiding foods that contain gluten.", "Causes": "Dermatitis herpetiformis usually begins in people age 20 and older. Children\u00a0can sometimes be affected. It is seen in both men and women.The cause is unknown. It is thought to be an autoimmune disorder. Dermatitis herpetiformis is\u00a0also linked to gluten sensitivity (celiac sprue disease) in the small bowel."}, "Death among children and adolescents": {"description": "Other top causes of accidental death are drowning, fire, falls, and poisoning."}, "Dental cavities": {"description": "Dental cavities are holes (or structural damage) in the teeth.", "Possible Complications": "Discomfort or pain, Fractured tooth, Inability to bite down on tooth, Tooth abscess, Tooth sensitivity. ", "Symptoms": ["Tooth pain or achy feeling, particularly after sweet, hot, or cold foods and drinks", "Visible pits or holes in the teeth"], "Exams and Tests": "Most cavities are discovered in the early stages during routine dental checkups. A dental exam may show that the surface of the tooth is soft.Dental x-rays may show some cavities before they are visible to the eye.", "Treatment": "Treatment can help prevent tooth damage from leading to cavities.Treatment may involve:Fillings, Crowns, Root canals. Dentists fill teeth by removing the decayed tooth material with a drill and replacing it with a material such as silver alloy, gold, porcelain, or composite resin. Porcelain and composite resin more closely match the natural tooth appearance, and are preferred for front teeth. Many dentists consider silver amalgam (alloy) and gold to be stronger, and these materials are often used on back teeth. There is a trend to use high strength composite resin in the back teeth as well.Crowns or \"caps\" are used if tooth decay is extensive and there is limited tooth structure, which may cause weakened teeth. Large fillings and weak teeth increase the risk of the tooth breaking. The decayed or weakened area is removed and repaired. A crown is fitted over the remainder of the tooth. Crowns are often made of gold, porcelain, or porcelain attached to metal.A root canal is recommended if the nerve in a tooth dies from decay or injury. The center of the tooth, including the nerve and blood vessel tissue (pulp), is removed along with decayed portions of the tooth. The roots are filled with a sealing material. The tooth is filled, and a crown is needed in most cases.", "Prevention": "Oral hygiene is necessary to prevent cavities. This consists of regular professional cleaning (every 6 months), brushing at least twice a day, and flossing at least daily. X-rays may be taken yearly to detect possible cavity development in high-risk areas of the mouth.Chewy, sticky foods (such as dried fruit or candy) are best if eaten as part of a meal rather than as a snack. If possible, brush the teeth or rinse the mouth with water after eating these foods. Minimize snacking, which creates a constant supply of acid in the mouth. Avoid constant sipping of sugary drinks or frequent sucking on candy and mints.Dental sealants can prevent some cavities. Sealants are thin plastic-like coatings applied to the chewing surfaces of the molars. This coating prevents the buildup of plaque in the deep grooves on these surfaces. Sealants are often applied on the teeth of children, shortly after the molars come in. Older people may also benefit from the use of tooth sealants.Fluoride is often recommended to protect against dental caries. People who get fluoride in their drinking water or by taking fluoride supplements have less tooth decay. Topical fluoride is also recommended to protect the surface of the teeth. This may include a fluoride toothpaste or mouthwash. Many dentists include application of topical fluoride solutions (applied to a localized area of the teeth) as part of routine visits.", "Causes": "Tooth decay is a common disorder, second only to the common cold. It usually occurs in children and young adults, but can affect any person. Tooth decay is a common cause of tooth loss in younger people.Bacteria are normally found in your mouth. These bacteria change foods -- especially sugar and starch -- into acids. Bacteria, acid, food pieces, and saliva combine in the mouth to form a sticky substance called plaque. Plaque adheres to the teeth. It is most common on the back molars, just above the gum line on all teeth, and at the edges of fillings. Plaque that is not removed from the teeth turns into a substance called tartar or calculus. Plaque and tartar irritate the gums, resulting in gingivitis and periodontitis.Plaque begins to build up on teeth within 20 minutes after eating. If it is not removed, tooth decay will begin.The acids in plaque damage the enamel covering your teeth, and create holes in the tooth (cavities). Cavities usually do not hurt, unless they grow very large and affect nerves or cause a tooth fracture. An untreated cavity can lead to a tooth abscess. Untreated tooth decay also destroys the inside of the tooth (pulp), which will require more extensive treatment, or worse case removal of the tooth.Carbohydrates (sugars and starches) increase the risk of tooth decay. Sticky foods are more harmful than non-sticky foods because they remain on the teeth. Frequent snacking increases the time that acids are in contact with the surface of the tooth."}, "Double aortic arch": {"description": "Double aortic arch is an abnormal formation of the aorta, the large artery that carries blood from the heart to the rest of the body. It is a congenital problem, which means that it is present at birth.", "Possible Complications": "Failure to thrive, Respiratory infections, Wearing away of the lining of the esophagus (esophageal erosion) and windpipe, Very rarely an abnormal connection between the esophagus and aorta (aortoesophageal fistula). ", "Symptoms": ["High-pitched sound during breathing (stridor)", "Noisy breathing", "Repeated pneumonias", "Wheezing ", "Choking", "Difficulty eating and swallowing", "Vomiting "], "Exams and Tests": "The symptoms may lead a doctor to suspect double aortic arch. Other tests will then be needed to diagnose this condition.The following tests can help diagnose double aortic arch:Chest x-ray, Scans that create cross-sectional images of the body (CT or MRI scan), Ultrasound examination of the heart (echocardiography), X-ray using a substance that outlines the esophagus (barium swallow). ", "Treatment": "Surgery can be done to fix double aortic arch. The surgery separates off the smaller branch of the double aortic arch to relieve pressure on the esophagus and windpipe (trachea).The surgeon ties off the smaller branch and separates it from the larger branch. Then the surgeon closes the ends of the aorta with stitches.", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent this condition.", "Causes": "Double aortic arch is a common form of a group of defects that affect the development of the aorta in the womb. These defects cause an abnormal formation called a vascular ring -- a circle of blood vessels.Normally, the aorta develops from one of several curved pieces of tissue (arches). As babies develop in the womb, the arches split into several parts. The body breaks down some of the arches, while others form into arteries. A normally developed aorta is a single arch that leaves the heart and moves leftward.In double aortic arch, some of the arches that should have changed into arteries or disappeared are still present at birth. Babies with a double aortic arch have an aorta that is made up of two vessels instead of one. The two parts to the aorta have smaller arteries branching off of them. As a result, the two branches go around and press down on the windpipe and the tube that carries food from the mouth to the stomach (esophagus).A double aortic arch may occur in other congenital heart defects, including:A chromosome defect, Tetralogy of Fallot, Transposition of the great arteries, Ventricular septal defect. Double aortic arch is very rare. Vascular rings make up a small percentage of all congenital heart problems. Of these, a little more than half are caused by double aortic arch. The condition occurs equally in males and females."}, "Dissect": {"description": "Dissect means to cut or separate tissues. Doctors dissect tissue during surgery. Most of the time, this is done to remove a part of the body that is thought to be diseased. Pathologists dissect dead bodies. This is part of doing an autopsy to determine the cause of death."}, "Digoxin test": {"description": "See also: Digoxin overdose"}, "Dupuytrens contracture": {"description": "Dupuytrens contracture is a painless thickening and tightening (contracture) of tissue beneath the skin on the palm of the hand and fingers.", "Possible Complications": "Worsening of the contracture may result in deformity and loss of function of the hand. There is a risk of injury to blood vessels and nerves during surgery.", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "The\u00a0doctor will examine your hands. Diagnosis can usually be made from the telltale signs of Dupuytrens contracture. Other tests are rarely needed.", "Treatment": "Your doctor may recommend exercises, warm water baths, or splints.Surgery may be\u00a0done to release the contracture. Normal movement of the fingers is usually restored by surgery followed by physical therapy exercises for the hand.A newer treatment involves injecting a substance called collagenase into the scarred or fibrous tissue. Three injections are needed. You may have side effects such as swelling, pain, and itching. A more rare but severe side effect is rupture of the tendon.", "Prevention": "Awareness of risk factors may allow early detection and treatment.", "Causes": "The cause is unknown. Family history of Dupuytrens contracture makes you more likely to develop this condition. It does not seem to be caused by occupation or from trauma.The condition is more common after age 40. Men are affected more often than women. Risk factors are alcoholism, diabetes, and smoking."}, "Dyshidrotic eczema": {"Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider may be able to diagnose this condition by looking at your skin.A skin biopsy may be needed to rule out other causes, such as a fungal infection or psoriasis.If your doctor thinks the condition may be due to an allergic reaction, allergy testing (patch testing) may be done.", "description": "Dyshidrotic eczema is a condition in which small blisters develop on the hands and feet. Blisters are often itchy.", "Causes": "This blistering type of eczema is twice as common in women than men.You are more likely to develop dyshidrotic eczema when:You are under stress, You have allergies, such as hay fever, Your hands are often in water or moist, You work with cement or do other work that exposes your hands to chromium, cobalt, nickel. The cause is unknown. The condition seems to appear during certain times of the year.", "Treatment": "Keep the skin moist (called lubricating or moisturizing the skin). Use ointments (such as petroleum jelly), creams, or lotions. Moisturizers:Should be free of alcohol, scents, dyes, fragrances, or other chemicals., Work best when they're applied to skin that is wet or damp. After washing or bathing, pat the skin dry and then apply the moisturizer right away., May be used at different times of the day. For the most part, you can apply these substances as often as you need, to keep your skin soft. . You can buy medicines that help you stop scratching without first seeing your doctor . Take an anti-itch medicine before bed if you scratch in your sleep., Some\u00a0antihistamines cause little or no sleepiness. These include fexofenadine (Allegra), loratadine (Claritin, Alavert), cetirizine (Zyrtec), and diphenhydramine (Benadryl). . Topical corticosteroids are medicines used to treat eczema.Topical means you place it on the skin. You will be prescribed a cream or ointment. Topical corticosteroids may also be called topical steroids or topical cortisones., Do not use more medicine or use it more often than your doctor advises you to. . Your doctor may also prescribe other creams or ointments, such as tacrolimus or pimecrolimus, to use on the skin. If symptoms are very bad, you may need other treatments, such as: Steroid pills, Coal tar preparations, Phototherapy (ultraviolet light therapy) . "}, "Diabetes - keeping active ": {"description": "You may think that only vigorous exercise is helpful. But this is not true. Increasing your daily activity by any amount can help improve your health. And there are a lot of ways to add more activity to your day."}, "Dengue fever": {"description": "See also: Dengue hemorrhagic fever", "Possible Complications": "Febrile convulsions, Severe dehydration. ", "Symptoms": ["Fatigue", "Headache (especially behind the eyes)", "Joint aches", "Muscle aches", "Nausea", "Swollen lymph nodes", "Vomiting", "Cough", "Sore throat", "Nasal stuffiness"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests that may be done to diagnose this condition include:Antibody titer for dengue virus types, Complete blood count (CBC), Polymerase chain reaction (PCR) test for dengue virus types, Liver function tests. ", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for dengue fever. You will need fluids if there are signs of dehydration. Acetaminophen (Tylenol) is used to treat a high fever. Avoid taking aspirin, ibuprofen (Advil, Motrin), and naproxen (Aleve). They may increase bleeding problems.", "Prevention": "Clothing, mosquito repellent, and netting can help reduce exposure to mosquitoes. Traveling during periods of minimal mosquito activity can also be helpful.Mosquito abatement programs may reduce the risk of infection. ", "Causes": "Dengue fever is caused by one of four different but related viruses. It is spread by the bite of mosquitoes, most commonly the mosquito Aedes aegypti, which is found in tropic and subtropic regions. This area includes parts of:Indonesian archipelago into northeastern Australia, South and Central America, Southeast Asia, Sub-Saharan Africa, Some parts of the Caribbean. Dengue fever is being seen more often in world travelers.Dengue fever should not be confused with Dengue hemorrhagic fever, which is a separate disease that is caused by the same type of virus, but has much more severe symptoms."}, "Digitalis toxicity": {"description": "The most common prescription form of this medication is called digoxin. Digitoxin is another form of digitalis.", "Possible Complications": "Arrhythmias, which may be deadly, Heart failure. ", "Symptoms": ["Confusion", "Irregular pulse", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea, vomiting, diarrhea", "Palpitations", "Vision changes (unusual), including blind spots, blurred vision, changes in how colors look, or seeing spots)\r\n  \r\n  ", "Decreased consciousness", "Decreased urine output", "Difficulty breathing when lying down", "Excessive nighttime urination", "Overall swelling"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will examine you. Your heart rate may be rapid or slow and\u00a0irregular.An ECG is done to check for irregular heart beats.Blood tests that will be done include:Blood chemistry, Kidney function tests including\r\n  BUN and creatinine, Digitoxin and digoxin test\u00a0to check levels, Potassium level, Magnesium level. ", "Treatment": "If the person is having trouble breathing,\u00a0get emergency medical help. If the person has stopped breathing, start CPR\u00a0and get emergency medical help.At the hospital, symptoms will be treated as appropriate. \r\nIf toxicity is due to a recent one-time exposure, treatment may involve:Activated charcoal, Tube through the mouth into the stomach to wash out the stomach (gastric lavage). Digitoxin blood levels may be lowered with repeated doses of charcoal, given after gastric lavage.Methods to cause vomiting are usually not done because vomiting can worsen slow heart rhythms.In severe cases, medications called digoxin-specific antibodies may be prescribed. Dialysis may be needed to reduce the levels of digitalis in the body.", "Prevention": "If you take digitalis medicine, you should have your\u00a0blood levels checked regularly. Blood chemistries should also be monitored to check for conditions that make this toxicity more common.Potassium supplements may be prescribed if you take diuretics and digitalis together. Or,\u00a0a potassium-sparing diuretic may be prescribed.", "Causes": "Digitalis toxicity can be caused by high levels of digitalis in the body. It may also be caused by a decreased tolerance to the drug. Patients with decreased tolerance may have normal levels of digitalis in their blood. Digitalis toxicity may occur in these patients\u00a0if they have other risk factors. People with heart failure who take digoxin are commonly given medications called diuretics, which remove excess fluid from the body. Many diuretics can cause potassium loss. Low levels of potassium in the body increase the risk of digitalis toxicity. Digitalis toxicity may also result in persons who take the drug and who have low levels of magnesium in the body.You are more likely to have this condition if you take digoxin, digitoxin, or other digitalis\u00a0medicines\u00a0along with drugs that interact with\u00a0it such as quinidine, flecainide, verapamil, amiodarone, and others.If your kidneys do not work well,\u00a0digitalis can build up in the body rather than be removed normally through urine.\u00a0Any problem that affects how your kidneys work\u00a0(including dehydration) makes digitalis toxicity more likely.Some plants such as oleander or lily of the valley have chemicals that can cause symptoms similar to digitalis toxicity if they are eaten."}, "Desipramine hydrochloride overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing slowed and labored", "Urinary hesitancy", "Blurred vision", "Dry mouth ", "Vomiting", "Irregular heartbeat", "Low blood pressure", "Shock", "Agitation", "Coma", "Confusion", "Convulsions", "Drowsiness", "Hallucinations (thinking something is there when it is not)", "Restlessness", "Stupor (lack of alertness)", "Uncoordinated movement"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Diphenhydramine overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Inability to urinate ", "Blurred vision", "Dry mouth", "Enlarged pupils", "Severely dry eyes", "Ringing in the ears ", "Low blood pressure", "Rapid heartbeat ", "Agitation", "Confusion", "Convulsions (seizures)", "Delirium", "Depression", "Drowsiness", "Hallucinations", "Increased sleepiness", "Nervousness", "Seizures", "Tremor", "Unsteadiness", "Dry, flushed, red skin "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Defining overweight and obesity - children ": {"description": "Child health experts recommend that children be screened for obesity at age 2. If needed, they should be referred to weight-management programs."}, "Diesel oil": {"Symptoms": ["Loss of vision", "Severe pain in the throat", "Severe pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue ", "Blood in the stool", "Burns of the\u00a0throat (esophagus)", "Severe abdominal pain", "Vomiting", "Vomiting blood", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure that develops rapidly ", "Breathing difficulty", "Throat swelling (may also cause breathing difficulty) ", "Agitation", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness)", "Confusion", "Dizziness", "Incoordination ", "Burns", "Irritation "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Developmental dysplasia of the hip": {"description": "Developmental dysplasia of the hip (DDH) is a dislocation of the hip joint that is present at birth. The condition is found in babies or young children.", "Possible Complications": "Bracing devices may cause skin irritation. Differences in the lengths of the legs may persist despite appropriate treatment.Untreated, hip dysplasia will lead to arthritis and deterioration of the hip, which can be severely debilitating.", "Symptoms": ["Leg with hip problem may appear to turn out more", "Reduced movement on the side of the body with the dislocation", "Shorter leg on the side with the hip dislocation", "Uneven skin folds of thigh or buttocks", "Waddling or limping while walking", "One shorter leg,\u00a0so the child walks on their toes on one side and not the other side", "The child\u2019s lower back is rounded inward"], "Exams and Tests": "Pediatric health care providers routinely screen all newborns and infants for hip dysplasia. There are several methods to detect a dislocated hip or a hip that is able to be dislocated.The most common method of identifying the condition is a physical exam of the hips, which involves applying pressure while moving the hips. The health care provider listens for any clicks, clunks, or pops.Ultrasound of the hip is used in younger infants to confirm the problem. An x-ray of the hip joint may help diagnose the condition in older infants and children.A hip that is truly dislocated in an infant should be detected at birth, but some cases are mild and symptoms may not develop until after birth, which is why multiple exams are recommended. Some mild cases are silent and cannot be found during a physical exam.", "Treatment": "When the problem is found during the first 6 months of life, a device or harness is used to keep the legs apart and turned outward (frog-leg position). This device will usually hold the hip joint in place while the child grows.This harness works for most infants when it is started before age 6 months, but it is less likely to work for older children.Children who do not improve, or who are diagnosed after 6 months often need surgery. After surgery, a cast will be placed on the child's leg for a period of time.", "Causes": "The hip is a ball and socket joint. The ball is called the femoral head. It forms the top part of the thigh bone (femur). The socket (acetabulum) forms in the pelvic bone.In some newborns, the socket is too shallow and the ball (thigh bone) may slip out of the socket, either part of the way or completely. One or both hips may be involved.The cause is unknown. Low levels of amniotic fluid in the womb during pregnancy can increase a baby's risk of DDH. Other risk factors include:Being the first child, Being female, Breech position during pregnancy, in which the baby's bottom is down, Family history of the disorder, Large birth weight. DDH occurs in about 1 to 1.5 of 1,000 births."}, "Dermatoses - systemic": {"description": "Dermatoses is a general term used to describe any skin defect or lesion on the skin. Systemic means it affects the whole body, rather than just one part.Systemic dermatoses may be linked to problems in other organs."}, "Diarrhea - what to ask your doctor - child ": {"description": "Below are questions you may want to ask a doctor or nurse if your child has diarrhea."}, "Dental care - child": {"description": "Proper care of your child's teeth and gums includes brushing and rinsing daily. It also includes having routine dental exams, and getting necessary treatments such as fluoride, extractions, fillings, or braces and other orthodontics. "}, "Diabetes eye exams": {"description": "You may not know your eyes are harmed until the problem is very bad. Your doctor can catch problems early if you get regular eye exams."}, "Duplex ultrasound ": {"description": "Related topics include:"}, "Dextrocardia ": {"description": "Dextrocardia is a condition in which the heart is pointed toward the right side of the chest. Normally, the heart points to the left. The condition is present at birth (congenital).", "Possible Complications": "Complications depend on whether dextrocardia is part of a larger syndrome, and whether other problems exist in the body. Complications include:Bacteria in the blood (septic shock), Blocked intestines (due to a condition called intestinal malrotation), Congestive heart failure, Death, Infection (heterotaxy with no spleen), Infertility in males (Kartagener syndrome), Repeated pneumonias, Repeated sinus infections (Kartagener syndrome). ", "Symptoms": ["Bluish skin", "Difficulty breathing", "Failure to grow and gain weight", "Fatigue", "Jaundice (yellow skin and eyes)", "Pale skin (pallor)", "Repeated sinus or lung infections"], "Exams and Tests": "There are no signs of dextrocardia if the heart is normal.Conditions that can include dextrocardia may cause the following signs:Abnormal arrangement and structure of the organs in the abdomen, Enlarged heart, Problems with the structure of the chest and lungs, seen on x-rays, Rapid breathing or problems breathing, Rapid pulse. Tests to diagnose dextrocardia include:Computed tomography (CT) scans, EKG -- a test to examine the electrical system of the heart, Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) of the heart, Ultrasound of the heart (echocardiogram), X-rays. ", "Treatment": "A complete mirror image dextrocardia with no heart defects requires no treatment. It is important, however, to let the child's health care provider know the heart is on the right side of the chest. This information can be important in some exams and tests.The type of treatment needed depends on the heart or physical problems the infant may have in addition to dextrocardia.If heart defects are present with dextrocardia, the baby will most likely need surgery. Babies that are very ill may need to take medicines before they can have surgery. These medicines\u00a0help the baby grow larger so surgery is easier to perform.Medicines include:\"Water pills\" (diuretics), Drugs that help the heart muscle pump more forcefully (inotropic agents), Drugs that lower blood pressure and ease the workload on the heart (ACE inhibitors) . The baby might also need surgery to correct problems in the organs of the abdomen.Children with Kartagener syndrome will need repeated treatment with antibiotics for sinus infections.Children with a missing or abnormal spleen need long-term antibiotics.All children with heart defects may need to get antibiotics before surgeries or dental treatments.", "Prevention": "Some syndromes that include dextrocardia may run in families. If you have a family history of heterotaxy, talk to your health care provider before becoming pregnant.There are no known ways to prevent dextrocardia. However, avoiding the use of illegal drugs (especially cocaine) before and during pregnancy may lower the risk of this problem.Talk to your health care provider if you have diabetes. This condition may contribute to your risk of having a child with certain forms of dextrocardia.", "Causes": "During the early weeks of pregnancy, the baby's heart develops. Sometimes, it turns so that it points to the right side of the chest instead of the left side. The reasons for this are unclear.There are several types of dextrocardia. Many types involve other defects of the heart and abdomen area.In the simplest type of dextrocardia, the heart is a mirror image of the normal heart and there are no other problems. This condition is rare. When this occurs, the organs of the abdomen and the lungs will often also be arranged in a mirror image. For example, the liver will be on the left side instead of the right.Some people with mirror-image dextrocardia have a problem with the fine hairs (cilia) that filter the air going into their nose and air passages. This condition is called Kartagener syndrome.In the more common types of dextrocardia, other heart defects are also present. The most common of these include: Double outlet right ventricle, Endocardial cushion defect, Pulmonary stenosis or atresia, Single ventricle, Transposition of the great vessels, Ventricular septal defect. The abdominal and chest organs in babies with dextrocardia may be abnormal and may not work correctly. A very serious syndrome that appears with dextrocardia is called heterotaxy. In this condition, many of the organs are not in their usual places and may not work properly. For example, the spleen may be completely missing. The spleen is an important part of the immune system, so babies born without this organ are in danger of severe bacterial infections and death. In another form of heterotaxy, several small spleens exist, but they may not work correctly.Heterotaxy may also include:Abnormal gallbladder system, Problems with the lungs, Problems with the structure or position of the intestines, Severe heart defects . Possible risk factors for dextrocardia include a family history of the condition."}, "Diazinon poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Eyes, ears, nose, and throat \r\n\r\nSmall pupils (unreactive to light), Tearing, increased. Heart and blood circulation. Low or high blood pressure, Slow or rapid heart rate, Convulsions. ", "Small pupils (unreactive to light)", "Tearing, increased", "Heart and blood circulation", "Low or high blood pressure", "Slow or rapid heart rate", "Convulsions", "LungsBreathing difficulty, Chest tightness. ", "Breathing difficulty", "Chest tightness", "Nervous system \r\n\r\nAnxiety, Coma, Dizziness, Excitability, Headache, Weakness, Tremor, Twitching. ", "Anxiety", "Coma", "Dizziness", "Excitability", "Headache", "Weakness", "Tremor", "Twitching", "Skin \r\n\r\nIrritation, Redness, Sweating. ", "Irritation", "Redness", "Sweating", "Stomach and gastrointestinal tract \r\n\r\nAbdominal cramps, Diarrhea, Loss of appetite, Nausea, Vomiting. ", "Abdominal cramps", "Diarrhea", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea", "Vomiting"], "description": "For information on other insecticide poisonings, see Insecticides."}, "Distal": {"description": "Distal is the opposite of proximal."}, "Developmental milestones record - 4 years": {"description": "There are skills and growth markers expected in a typical 4-year-old child. These milestones are physical and mental developments considered normal for this age group."}, "Delirium tremens": {"description": "Delirium tremens is a severe form of alcohol withdrawal that involves sudden and severe mental or nervous system changes.", "Possible Complications": "Injury from falls during seizures, Injury to self or others caused by mental state (confusion/delirium), Irregular heartbeat, may be life threatening, Seizures. ", "Symptoms": ["Body tremors", "Changes in mental function", "Agitation, irritability", "Confusion, disorientation", "Decreased attention span", "Deep sleep that lasts for a day or longer", "Delirium", "Excitement", "Fear", "Hallucinations (seeing or feeling things that are not really there)", "Increased activity", "Quick mood changes", "Restlessness, excitement", "Sensitivity to light, sound, touch", "Stupor, sleepiness, fatigue", "Most common in first 12 - 48 hours after last drink", "Most common in people with past complications from alcohol withdrawal", "Usually generalized tonic-clonic seizures", "Anxiety", "Depression", "Fatigue", "Feeling jumpy or nervous", "Feeling shaky", "Headache", "Insomnia (difficulty falling and staying asleep)", "Irritability or excitability", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea", "Pale skin", "Palpitations (sensation of feeling the heart beat)", "Rapid emotional changes", "Sweating, especially on the palms of the hands or the face", "Vomiting ", "Chest pain", "Fever", "Stomach pain"], "Exams and Tests": "Delirium tremens is a medical emergency.The health care provider will perform a physical exam. Signs may include:Heavy sweating, Increased startle reflex, Irregular heartbeat, Problems with eye muscle movement, Rapid heart rate, Rapid muscle tremors. The following tests may be done:Blood magnesium level, Blood phosphate level, Comprehensive metabolic panel, Electrocardiogram (ECG), Electroencephalogram (EEG), Toxicology screen. ", "Treatment": "The goals of treatment are to:Save the person's life, Relieve symptoms, Prevent complications. A hospital stay is needed. The health care team will regularly check:Blood chemistry results, such as electrolyte levels, Body fluid levels, Vital signs (temperature, pulse, rate of breathing, blood pressure). Symptoms such as agitation, seizures, and irregular heartbeat are treated with the following medications:Sedatives such as diazepam or lorazepam, Anticonvulsants such as phenobarbital. The patient may need to be put into a sedated state for a week or more until withdrawal and DTs are finished. Benzodiazepine medications such as diazepam or lorazepam also help treat seizures, anxiety, and tremors.Antipsychotic medications such as haloperidol may sometimes be needed for persons with severe psychotic symptoms, especially if they have an underlying problem such as schizophrenia. However, these drugs should be avoided if possible because they may contribute to seizures.Long-term preventive treatment should begin after the patient recovers from immediate symptoms. This may involve a \"drying out\" period, in which no alcohol is allowed. Total and lifelong avoidance of alcohol (abstinence) is recommended for most people who go through withdrawal. The person should receive treatment for alcohol use or alcoholism, including:Counseling, Support groups (such as Alcoholics Anonymous). The patient should be tested, and if needed, treated for other medical problems that can occur with alcohol use. Such problems may include:Alcoholic cardiomyopathy, Alcoholic liver disease, Alcoholic neuropathy, Wernicke-Korsakoff syndrome. ", "Prevention": "Avoid or reduce the use of alcohol. Get prompt medical treatment for symptoms of alcohol withdrawal.For more information, see: Alcoholism", "Causes": "Delirium tremens can occur when you stop drinking alcohol after a period of heavy drinking, especially if you do not eat enough food.Delirium tremens may also be caused by head injury, infection, or illness in people with a history of heavy alcohol use.It is most common in people who have a history of alcohol withdrawal. It is especially common in those who drink 4 - 5 pints of wine or 7 - 8 pints of beer (or 1 pint of \"hard\" alcohol) every day for several months. Delirium tremens also commonly affects people who have had an alcohol habit or alcoholism for more than 10 years."}, "Diagnostic laparoscopy": {"description": "Diagnostic laparoscopy is a procedure that allows a doctor to look directly at the contents of a patient's abdomen or pelvis."}, "Diaper rash": {"Symptoms": ["Bright red rash that gets bigger", "Very\u00a0red and scaly areas on the scrotum and penis in boys", "Red or scaly areas on the labia and vagina in girls", "Pimples, blisters, ulcers, large bumps, or sores filled with pus\u00a0", "Smaller red patches (called satellite lesions) that grow and blend in with the other patches "], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor or nurse can often diagnose a yeast diaper rash by looking at your baby's skin. A KOH test can confirm if it is Candida. ", "description": "A diaper rash is a skin problem that develops in the area beneath an infant's diaper.", "Causes": "Diaper rashes are common in babies between 4 and 15 months old. They may be noticed more when babies begin to eat solid foods.Diaper rashes caused by infection with a yeast (fungus) called Candida are very common in children. Candida\u00a0grows best in warm, moist places, such as under a diaper.\u00a0Candida diaper rash is more likely to occur in babies who:Are not kept clean and dry, Are taking antibiotics or whose mothers are taking antibiotics while breast feeding, Have more frequent stools . Other causes of diaper rash include:Acids in the stool (seen more often when the child has diarrhea), Ammonia (a chemical produced when bacteria break down urine), Diapers that are too tight or rub the skin, Reactions to soaps and other products used to clean cloth diapers . ", "Treatment": "The best treatment for a diaper rash is to keep the diaper area clean and dry. This also helps prevent new diaper rashes. Lay your baby on a towel without a diaper\u00a0whenever possible. The more time the baby can be kept out of a diaper, the better.Other tips include:Change your baby's diaper often and as soon as possible after the baby urinates or passes stool, Use water and a soft cloth or cotton ball to gently clean the diaper area with every diaper change.\u00a0Do not\u00a0rub or scrub the area. A squirt bottle of water may be used for sensitive areas., Pat the area dry or allow to air-dry., Put diapers on loosely. Diapers that are too tight do not\u00a0allow enough air flow\u00a0and may rub and irritate the baby's waist or thighs., Using absorbent diapers helps keep the skin dry and reduces the chance of getting an infection., Always wash your hands before and after changing a diaper., Ask your doctor or nurse which creams, ointments, or powders are best to use in the diaper area., Ask if a diaper rash cream would be helpful. Zinc oxide or petroleum jelly-based products help keep moisture away from baby's skin when applied to completely clean, dry skin., Do\u00a0not use wipes that have alcohol or perfume. They may dry out or irritate the skin more., Do not\u00a0use corn starch on your baby's bottom. It can make a\u00a0candida diaper rash worse., Do\u00a0not use talc (talcum powder). It can get into your baby's lungs. . Certain skin creams and ointments will clear up infections caused by yeast. Nystatin, miconazole, clotrimazole, and ketaconazole are commonly used medicines for yeast diaper rashes. You can buy these without a prescription. Sometimes a mild corticosteroid cream may be used. Talk to your doctor before trying this on your baby.If you use cloth diapers:Do not put\u00a0plastic or rubber pants over the diaper. They do not allow enough air to pass through., Do not use fabric softeners or dryer sheets. They may make the rash worse., When washing cloth diapers, rinse 2 or 3 times to remove all soap if your child already has a rash or has had one before. . "}, "Double outlet right ventricle ": {"description": "Both the pulmonary artery (which carries oxygen-poor blood to the lungs) and aorta (which carries oxygen-rich blood from the heart to the body) come from the same pumping chamber. No arteries are connected to the left ventricle (the chamber that normally pumps blood to the body).", "Possible Complications": "Complications from DORV may include:Congestive heart failure (CHF), High blood pressure in the lungs, Irreversible damage to the lungs due to untreated high blood pressure in the lungs . Children with this congenital heart disease may need to take antibiotics before dental treatment. This prevents infections around the heart. Antibiotics may also be needed after surgery.", "Symptoms": ["Baby tires easily, especially when feeding", "Bluish color of the skin and lips", "Clubbing (thickening of the nail beds) on toes and fingers (late sign)", "Failure to gain weight and grow", "Pale coloring", "Sweating", "Swollen legs or abdomen", "Trouble breathing "], "Exams and Tests": "Signs of DORV may include:Enlarged heart, Heart murmur, Rapid breathing, Rapid heartbeat. Tests to diagnose DORV include:Chest x-rays, Passing a thin, flexible tube into the heart to measure blood pressure and inject dye for special pictures of the heart and arteries (cardiac catheterization), Ultrasound exam of the heart (echocardiogram), Using magnets to create images of the heart (MRI). ", "Treatment": "Treatment requires surgery to close the hole in the heart and direct blood from the left ventricle into the aorta. Surgery may also be needed to move the pulmonary artery or aorta.Factors that determine the type and number of operations the baby needs include: The type of DORV, The severity of the defect, The presence of other problems in the heart, The child's overall condition . ", "Causes": "In a normal heart structure, the aorta connects to the left ventricle, the chamber that pumps blood into the body. The pulmonary artery normally is connected to the right ventricle. In DORV, both arteries flow out of the right ventricle. This is a problem because the right ventricle carries oxygen-poor blood. This blood is then circulated throughout the body. Another defect called a ventricular septal defect (VSD) always occurs with DORV. Other conditions that may be part of the defect are pulmonary valve stenosis and transposition of the great arteries. Oxygen-rich blood from the lungs flows from the left side of the heart, through the VSD opening and into the right chamber. This helps the infant with DORV, because it allows oxygen-rich blood to mix with blood lacking in oxygen. Even with this mixture, the body may not get enough oxygen. This makes the heart work harder to meet the body\u2019s needs. There are several types of DORV. The difference between these types is the location of the VSD compared to the location of the pulmonary artery and aorta. The symptoms and severity of the problem will depend on the type of DORV the baby has. The presence of pulmonary valve stenosis also affects the condition. People with DORV often have other heart abnormalities, such as:Coarctation of the aorta, Mitral valve problems, Pulmonary atresia, Pulmonary valve stenosis, Right aortic arch, Transposition of the great arteries . "}, "Dimenhydrinate overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Inability to urinate ", "Blurred vision", "Dry mouth", "Enlarged pupils", "Severely dry eyes", "Ringing in the ears ", "Low blood pressure", "Rapid heartbeat", "Agitation", "Confusion", "Convulsions (seizures)", "Delirium", "Depression", "Drowsiness", "Hallucinations", "Increased sleepiness", "Nervousness", "Tremor", "Unsteadiness", "Dry, flushed, red skin "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Drug abuse": {"description": "Drug abuse is the recurrent use of illegal drugs, or the misuse of prescription or over-the-counter drugs with negative consequences. These consequences may involve "}, "Doppler ultrasound exam of an arm or leg": {"description": "This test uses ultrasound\u00a0to look at the blood flow in the large arteries and veins in the arms and legs."}, "Dysarthria - care": {"description": "Dysarthria is a condition that occurs when there are problems with the muscles that help you talk. Most times, dysarthria occurs:"}, "Dry eye syndrome": {"description": "Dry eyes develop when the eye is unable to maintain a healthy coating of tears\r\n", "Possible Complications": "In severe cases, the clear covering on the eye (cornea) may be come damaged or infected.", "Symptoms": ["Blurred vision", "Burning, itching, or redness in the eye", "Gritty or scratchy feeling in the eye", "Sensitivity to light"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests may include:Visual acuity measurement, Slit lamp exam, Diagnostic staining of the cornea and tear film, Measurement of tear film break-up time (TBUT), Measurement of rate of tear production (Schirmer's test), Measurement of concentration of tears (osmolalilty). ", "Treatment": "The first step in treatment is artificial tears. These come as preserved (screw cap bottle) and unpreserved (twist open vial). Preserved tears are more bottle) convenient, but some people are sensitive to preservatives. There are many brands available without a prescription.Start using the drops at least 2-4 times per day. If your symptoms are not better after\u00a0a couple of weeks of regular use:Increase use (up to every 2 hours), Try a different brand, Talk to your health care provider if you can\u2019t find a brand that works for you . Other medical treatments may include:Fish oil 2-3 times per day, Glasses, goggles or contact lenses that keep moisture in the eyes, Medicines such as Restasis, topical corticosteroids, and oral tetracycline and doxycycline, Tiny plugs placed in the tear drainage ducts to moisture stay on the surface of the eye longer.  \r\n Other helpful steps include:Don't smoke and avoid second-hand smoke, direct wind, and air conditioning., Use a humidifier, especially in the winter., Limit allergy and cold medicines that may dry you out and worsen your symptoms., Purposefully blink more often. Rest your eyes once in a while.\u00a0, Clean eyelashes regularly and apply and warm compresses.. Some dry eye symptoms are due to sleeping with the eyes slightly open. Lubricating ointments work best for this problem. You should use them only in small amounts since they can blur your vision. It is best to use them before sleep.Surgery may be helpful if symptoms are because the eyelids are in an abnormal position.\u00a0\r\n ", "Prevention": "Stay away from dry environments and things that irritate your eyes\u00a0to help prevent symptoms.", "Causes": "\r\nDry eye usually occurs in people who are otherwise healthy. It becomes more common with age. This can occur due to hormonal changes that make your eyes produce fewer tears. Other common causes of dry eyes include:Dry environment or workplace (wind, air conditioning), Sun exposure, Smoking or second-hand smoke exposure, Cold or allergy medicines. Dry eye can also be caused by:Heat or chemical burns, Previous eye surgery, A rare autoimmune disorder\u00a0in which the glands that produce tears are destroyed (Sj\u00f6gren syndrome)\r\n  . "}, "Depression - resources": {"description": "The following organizations are good resources of information on depression:"}, "Developmental milestones record - 5 years": {"description": "This article describes the expected skills and growth markers of most 5-year-old children."}, "Dental plaque identification at home": {"description": "Plaque is the major cause of tooth decay and gum disease (gingivitis). It is hard to see with the naked eye because it is whitish colored, like teeth."}, "Diabetes insipidus - central": {"description": "Central diabetes insipidus is a rare condition that involves extreme thirst and excessive urination. ", "Possible Complications": "Not drinking enough fluids can lead to dehydration and electrolyte imbalance.When taking vasopressin and your body's thirst control is not normal, drinking more fluids than your body needs can cause dangerous electrolyte imbalance. ", "Symptoms": ["Increased urine production", "Excessive thirst", "Confusion and changes in alertness due to dehydration and higher than normal sodium level in the body, if the person is unable to drink "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will ask about your medical history and symptoms.Tests that may be ordered include:Blood sodium and osmolarity, Desmopressin (DDAVP) challenge, MRI of the head, Urinalysis, Urine concentration , Urine output. ", "Treatment": "The cause of the underlying condition will be treated.Vasopressin (desmopressin, DDAVP) is given either as a nasal spray, tablets, or injections. This controls urine output and fluid balance and prevents dehydration.In mild cases, drinking more water may be all that is needed. If the body's thirst control is not working (for example, if the hypothalamus is damaged), a prescription for a certain amount of water intake may also be needed to ensure proper hydration.", "Prevention": "Many of the cases may not be preventable. Prompt treatment of infections, tumors, and injuries may reduce risk.", "Causes": "Central diabetes insipidus occurs when the body has a lower than normal amount of antidiuretic hormone (ADH). ADH is also called vasopressin. ADH is produced in a part of the brain called the hypothalamus. It is then stored and released from the pituitary gland. This is a small gland at the base of the brain.ADH controls the amount of water excreted in urine. Without ADH, the kidneys do not work properly to keep enough water in the body. The result is a rapid loss of water from the body in the form of dilute urine. This results in the need to drink large amounts of water due to extreme thirst and to make up for excessive water loss in the urine (as much as 4 gallons a day).The reduced level of ADH may be caused by damage to the hypothalamus or pituitary gland. This damage may be due to surgery, infection, inflammation, tumor, or injury to the brain.Sometimes the cause is unknown. In rare cases, central diabetes insipidus is caused by a genetic problem."}, "Decorticate posture": {"description": "This type of posturing is a sign of severe damage in the brain. People who have this condition should get medical attention right away.", "Causes": "Bleeding in the brain from any cause (intracranial hemorrhage), Brain stem tumor , Cerebral infarction (stroke), Encephalopathy (brain problem due to drugs, poisoning, or infection), Head injury, Hepatic encephalopathy (brain problem due to liver failure)\u00a0, Increased pressure in the brain (intracranial hypertension) from any cause, Primary brain tumor, Secondary brain tumor. "}, "Deep vein thrombosis - discharge": {"description": "DVT - discharge; Blood clot in the legs - discharge; Thromboembolism - discharge"}, "Dietary fat and children": {"description": "Children should be taught healthy eating habits early, so they may continue them throughout life."}, "Drain opener poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Severe change in acid level of blood (pH balance), which leads to damage in all of the body organs", "Burns to the eyes, which may result in permanent vision loss", "Severe pain in the throat", "Severe pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue", "Blood in the stool", "Burns and possible holes in the\u00a0throat (esophagus)", "Severe abdominal pain", "Vomiting", "Vomiting blood", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure that develops rapidly", "Breathing difficulty (from breathing in drain opening agent)", "Throat swelling (may also cause breathing difficulty)", "Burns", "Holes (necrosis) in the skin or tissues underneath", "Irritation"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "D-xylose absorption": {"description": "D-xylose absorption is a laboratory test to determine how well the intestines absorb a simple sugar (D-xylose). The test helps determine if nutrients are being properly absorbed."}, "Diabetes - preventing heart attack and stroke": {"description": "Other things you can do to lower your risks are:"}, "Dental care - adult": {"description": "Plaque and tartar lead to a number of problems:"}, "Diaphragmatic hernia repair - congenital": {"description": "In a child born with a diaphragmatic hernia, the diaphragm muscle is not completely formed, so organs from the belly (stomach, spleen, liver, and intestines) may go up into the chest cavity where the lungs are. This prevents the lung(s) from growing normally. The lung stays too small for a baby to breathe on his or her own when they are born. "}, "Digital rectal exam": {"description": "A digital rectal exam is an examination of the lower rectum. The doctor uses a gloved, lubricated finger to check for any abnormal findings."}, "Dementia due to metabolic causes": {"description": "Dementia due to metabolic causes is a loss of brain function that can occur with abnormal chemical processes in the body. If these processes can be treated soon enough, brain function can return to normal. Left untreated, these chemical abnormalities cause permanent brain damage and dementia. ", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include the following:Loss of ability to function or care for self, Loss of ability to interact, Pneumonia, urinary tract infections, and skin infections, Pressure sores, Symptoms of the underlying problem (such as loss of sensation due to a nerve injury\u00a0from vitamin B12 deficiency). ", "Symptoms": ["Difficulty with tasks that take some thought but used to come easily, such as balancing a checkbook, playing games (such as bridge), and learning new information or routines", "Getting lost on familiar routes", "Language problems, such as trouble with names of familiar objects", "Losing interest in things previously enjoyed, flat mood", "Misplacing items", "Personality changes and loss of social skills, which can lead to inappropriate behaviors", "Changing sleep patterns, often waking up at night", "Forgetting details about current events, forgetting events in one's life history", "Having difficulty doing basic tasks, such as preparing meals, choosing proper clothing, or driving", "Having hallucinations, arguments, striking out, and behaving violently", "More difficulty reading or writing", "Poor judgment and losing the ability to recognize danger", "Using the wrong word, not pronouncing words correctly, speaking in confusing sentences", "Withdrawing from social contact"], "Exams and Tests": "An examination of the nervous system (neurologic examination) can show different problems, depending on the cause.Tests to diagnose a medical condition causing the dementia may include:Ammonia level in the blood, Blood chemistry, electrolytes, Blood glucose level, BUN, creatinine to check kidney function, Liver function tests, Lumbar puncture (spinal tap), Nutritional assessment, Thyroid function tests, Urinalysis, Vitamin B12 level. To rule out certain brain disorders, an EEG, head CT scan, or head MRI scan is usually done.", "Treatment": "Treatment focuses on managing the disorder and controlling symptoms. With some metabolic disorders, treatment may stop or even reverse the dementia symptoms.Medications used to treat Alzheimer disease have not been shown to work for this type of dementia. Sometimes these drugs are used anyway, when other treatments are unable to control the underlying problems.Plans should also be made for home care for a loved one with dementia.", "Prevention": "Treating the metabolic disorder may reduce the risk of developing this type of dementia.", "Causes": "Metabolic causes of dementia include:Endocrine disorders, such as Addison disease, Cushing disease, Heavy metal exposure, such as to lead, arsenic, mercury, or manganese, Repeat episodes of low blood sugar (hypoglycemia), most often seen in people with diabetes who use insulin, Hyperparathyroidism, which is a very high level of calcium in the blood, Hypothyroidism (low levels of thyroid hormone) or thyrotoxicosis (very high levels of thyroid hormone in the body), Liver cirrhosis, Kidney failure, Nutritional disorders, such as vitamin B1 deficiency, vitamin B12 deficiency, pellagra, or protein-calorie malnutrition, Porphyria, Poisons, such as methanol, Severe alcohol use, Wilson disease, Disorders of the mitochondria (energy-producing parts of cells), Rapid changes in sodium level . "}, "Delayed growth": {"description": "Delayed growth is poor or abnormally slow height or weight gains in a child younger than age 5. This may just be normal, and the child may outgrow it.", "Causes": "Constitutional growth delay refers to children who are small for their age but are growing at a normal rate. Puberty is often late in these children.These children continue to grow after most of their peers have stopped. Most of the time, they will reach an adult height similar to their parents' height. However, other causes of growth delay must be ruled out.Genetics may also play a role. One or both parents may be short. Short but healthy parents may have a healthy child who is in the shortest 5% for his or her age. These children are short, but they should reach the height of one or both of their parents.Delayed or slower-than-expected growth can be caused by many different things, including:Chronic disease, Endocrine disorders, Emotional health, Infection, Poor nutrition. Many children with delayed growth also have delays in development."}, "Dacryoadenitis": {"description": "Dacryoadenitis is inflammation of the tear-producing gland (lacrimal gland).", "Possible Complications": "Swelling may be severe enough to put pressure on the eye and distort vision. Some patients who were\u00a0first thought to have dacryoadenitis may turn out to have cancer of the lacrimal gland.", "Symptoms": ["Swelling of the outer portion of the upper lid, with possible redness and tenderness\r\n", "Pain in the area of swelling\r\n", "Excess tearing or discharge\r\n", "Swelling of lymph nodes in front of the ear"], "Exams and Tests": "Dacryoadenitis can be diagnosed by an\u00a0examination of the eyes and lids. Special tests, such as a CT scan may be required to search for the cause. Sometimes a biopsy will be needed to\u00a0make sure that a tumor of the lacrimal gland is not present.", "Treatment": "If the cause of dacryoadenitis is a viral condition such as mumps, rest and warm compresses may be enough. In other cases, the treatment depends on the disease that caused dacryoadenitis.", "Prevention": "Mumps can be prevented by getting vaccinated. You can avoid getting infected with gonococcus, the bacteria that cause gonorrhea,\u00a0by using\u00a0safe sex practices. Most other causes cannot be prevented.", "Causes": "Acute dacryoadenitis is most commonly due to viral or bacterial infection. Common causes include mumps, Epstein-Barr virus, staphylococcus, and gonococcus.Chronic dacryoadenitis is usually due to noninfectious inflammatory disorders. Examples include sarcoidosis, thyroid eye disease, and orbital pseudotumor."}, "Diet and substance use recovery": {"description": "The following tips can help improve the odds of a lasting and healthy recovery:"}, "Dementia - daily care": {"description": "People who have dementia may have trouble with: "}, "Developmental coordination disorder": {"description": "Developmental coordination disorder is a childhood disorder that leads to poor coordination and clumsiness.", "Possible Complications": "Developmental coordination disorder can lead to:Learning problems, Low self-esteem resulting from poor ability at sports and teasing by other children, Repeated injuries, Weight gain as a result of not wanting to participate in physical activities (such as sports) . ", "Symptoms": ["Clumsiness", "Delays in sitting up, crawling, and walking", "Problems with sucking and swallowing during first year of life", "Problems with gross motor coordination (for example, jumping, hopping, or standing on 1 foot)", "Problems with visual or fine motor coordination (for example, writing, using scissors, tying shoelaces, or tapping 1 finger to another) "], "Exams and Tests": "Physical causes and other types of learning disabilities must be ruled out before the diagnosis can be confirmed.", "Treatment": "Physical education and perceptual motor training (combining movement with tasks that require thinking, like math or reading) are the best ways to treat coordination disorder. Using a computer to take notes may help children who have trouble writing.Children with developmental coordination disorder are more likely to be overweight than other children their age. Encouraging physical activity is important to prevent obesity.", "Prevention": "Families who are affected by this condition should try to recognize problems early and have them treated. Early treatment will lead to future success.", "Causes": "A small number of school-age children have some kind of developmental coordination disorder. Children with this disorder may:Have trouble holding objects, Have an unsteady walk, Run into other children, Trip over their own feet . Developmental coordination disorder may occur alone or with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder\u00a0(ADHD) or other learning disorders, such as communication disorders or disorder of written expression."}, "Diarrhea - overview": {"description": "Diarrhea is when you pass loose or watery stool. ", "Causes": "The most common cause of diarrhea is the stomach flu (viral gastroenteritis). This mild viral infection goes away on its own within a few days.Eating or drinking food or water that contains certain types of bacteria or parasites can also lead to diarrhea. This problem may be called food poisoning.Certain medicines may also cause diarrhea, including:Some antibiotics, Chemotherapy drugs for cancer, Laxatives containing magnesium . Diarrhea may also be caused by medical disorders, such as:Celiac disease, Inflammatory bowel diseases (Crohn disease and ulcerative colitis), Irritable bowel syndrome (IBS), Lactose intolerance (which causes problems after drinking milk and eating other dairy products), Malabsorption syndromes. Less common causes of diarrhea include:Carcinoid syndrome, Disorders of the nerves that supply the intestines, Removal of part of the stomach (gastrectomy) or small intestine, Radiation therapy . People who travel to third-world or developing countries can get diarrhea from unclean water or food that isn't handled safely. Plan ahead by learning the risks and treatment for traveler's diarrhea before your trip."}, "Diphtheria, tetanus, and pertussis (DTaP) vaccines - what you need to know": {"description": "Content source: National Center for Immunization and Respiratory Diseases"}, "D-dimer test": {"description": "D-dimer tests are used to check for blood clotting problems. Blood clots can cause health problems, such as:"}, "Dizziness and vertigo - aftercare": {"description": "Along with lightheadedness and vertigo, you may also have:"}, "Dermabrasion": {"description": "Dermabrasion is the removal of the top layers of the skin. It is a type of skin-smoothing surgery."}, "Drug-induced immune hemolytic anemia": {"description": "Drug-induced immune hemolytic anemia is a blood disorder that occurs when a medicine triggers the body's defense (immune) system to attack its own red blood cells. This causes red blood cells to break down earlier than normal, a process called hemolysis.", "Possible Complications": "Death caused by severe anemia is rare.", "Symptoms": ["Dark urine", "Fatigue", "Pale skin color", "Rapid heart rate", "Shortness of breath", "Yellow skin color (jaundice)"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam may show an enlarged spleen. You may have blood and urine tests to help diagnose this condition.Tests may include:Absolute reticulocyte count, Direct or indirect Coombs' test, Indirect bilirubin levels, Red blood cell count, Serum haptoglobin, Urine hemoglobin. ", "Treatment": "Stopping the drug that is causing the problem may relieve or control the symptoms.You may need to take a medicine called prednisone to reduce the immune response against the red blood cells. Special blood transfusions may be needed to treat severe symptoms", "Prevention": "Avoid the drug that caused this condition.", "Causes": "In some cases, a drug can cause the immune system to mistake your own \u00a0red blood cells for foreign substances. The body responds by making antibodies then against the red blood cells. The antibodies attach to red blood cells and cause them to break down too early.Drugs that can cause this type of hemolytic anemia include:Cephalosporins (a class of antibiotics) -- most common cause, Dapsone, Levodopa, Levofloxacin, Methyldopa, Nitrofurantoin, Nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs), Penicillin and its derivatives, Phenazopyridine (pyridium), Quinidine. A rare form of the disorder is hemolytic anemia from a lack of glucose-6 phosphate dehydrogenase (G6PD). In this case, the breakdown of red blood cells is due to a certain type of stress in the cell.Drug-induced hemolytic anemia is rare in children."}, "Developmental milestones record - 2 months": {"description": "This article describes the skills and growth targets of 2-month-old infants."}, "Dietary fats explained": {"description": "All fats are made up of saturated and unsaturated fatty acids. Fats are called saturated or unsaturated depending on how much of each type of fatty acid they contain."}, "Diabetes and nerve damage": {"Symptoms": ["Not notice when you step on something sharp", "Not know that you have a blister or small cut", "Not notice when your feet or hands\u00a0touch something that is too hot or cold", "Feeling full after eating only a small amount of food", "Heartburn and bloating", "Nausea, constipation, or diarrhea", "Swallowing problems ", "Throwing up undigested food a few hours after a meal", "Feel light-headed when you stand up (orthostatic hypotension)", "Have a fast heart rate", "Not notice angina, the chest pain that warns of heart disease and heart attack", "Sexual problems, which cause trouble getting an erection in men and vaginal dryness or orgasm problems in women", "Not being able to tell when your blood sugar gets too low", "Bladder problems, which cause\u00a0urine leakage or not being\u00a0able to empty the bladder.", "Sweating too much, even\u00a0when the temperature is cool,\u00a0when you're at rest, or at other unusual times", "Feet that are very sweaty (early damage) or very dry (later)"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will do a physical exam. The exam\u00a0may find that you have the following:No reflexes or weak reflexes in the ankle, Loss of feeling in the feet (this is checked with a brush-like instrument called a monofilament), Changes in the skin, including dry skin and thick or discolored nails, Loss of the ability to sense movement of your joints (proprioception), Drop in blood pressure when you stand up after sitting or lying down. Tests that may be\u00a0ordered include:Electromyogram (EMG), a recording of electrical activity in muscles, Nerve conduction velocity tests (NCV), a recording of the speed at which signals travel along nerves, Gastric emptying study to check how fast food leaves the stomach and enters the small intestine, Tilt table study to check if the nervous system is properly controlling blood pressure. ", "description": "Nerve damage that occurs in people with diabetes is called diabetic neuropathy. This condition is a complicaiton of diabetes.", "Causes": "In people with diabetes, the body's nerves can be damaged by decreased blood flow and a high blood sugar level. This condition is more likely when the blood sugar level is not well controlled.About half of people with diabetes develop nerve damage. Symptoms often do not begin until many years after diabetes has been diagnosed. Some persons who have diabetes that develops slowly already have nerve damage when they are first diagnosed.", "Treatment": "Follow your health care provider's advice on how to slow diabetic nerve damage. Control your blood sugar (glucose) level by:Eating healthy foods, Getting regular exercise, Checking your blood sugar as often as instructed and keeping a record of your numbers so that you know the types of foods and activities that affect your blood sugar\u00a0level, Taking medicine or insulin as instructed by your health care provider . To treat the symptoms of nerve damage, your health care provider may prescribe medicines to treat: Pain in your feet, legs, or arms, Nausea, vomiting, or other digestion problems, Bladder problems, Erection problems or vaginal dryness . When you have nerve damage in\u00a0your feet, the feeling in your feet can be reduced. You can even have no feeling at all. As a result, your feet may not heal well if they are injured. Caring for your feet can prevent minor problems from becoming so serious that you end up in the hospital.Caring for your feet includes:Checking your feet every day, Getting a foot exam\u00a0each time you see your health care provider, Wearing\u00a0the right kind of socks and shoes (ask your health care provider about this) . "}, "Drain cleaner poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain (severe)", "Breathing difficulty due to throat swelling", "Collapse", "Diarrhea", "Loss of vision if the poison touched the eyes\r\n ", "Mouth pain (severe)", "Rapid drop in blood pressure", "Throat pain (severe)", "Severe burns and tissue damage", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or a local poison control center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Drug-induced hypoglycemia": {"description": "Drug-induced hypoglycemia is low blood sugar that results from medication.", "Causes": "Low blood sugar is common in people with diabetes who are taking insulin or other medicines to control their diabetes.All of the following can cause blood sugar (glucose) levels to drop:Drinking alcohol, Getting too much activity, Intentionally or unintentionally overdosing on the medications used to treat diabetes, Missing meals . Even when diabetes is managed very carefully, the medications used to treat diabetes can result in drug-induced hypoglycemia. The condition may also occur when someone without diabetes takes a medicine used to treat diabetes. In rare cases, non-diabetes-related medicines may cause hypoglycemia.Medications that can cause drug-induced hypoglycemia include:Bactrim (an antibiotic), Beta-blockers, Haloperidol, Insulin, MAO inhibitors, Metformin when used with sulfonylureas, Pentamidine, Quinidine, Quinine, SGLT2 inhibitors (such as dapagliflozin and empagliflozin), Sulfonylureas, Thiazolidinediones (such as Actos and Avandia). "}, "Delta-ALA": {"description": "Delta-ALA is a protein (amino acid) produced by the liver. A test can be done to measure the amount of this substance in the urine."}, "Dacron graft": {"description": "See also: Stent"}, "Diet and eating after esophagectomy": {"description": "You will probably have a feeding tube for 1 to 2 months after surgery. This will help you get enough calories so that you start to gain weight. You will also be on a special diet when you first get home."}, "Developmental milestones record - 12 months": {"description": "The typical 12-month-old child will demonstrate certain physical and mental skills. These skills are called developmental milestones."}, "Dialysis centers - what to expect": {"description": "If you need dialysis for kidney disease, you have a few options for how to receive treatment. Many people have dialysis in a treatment center. This article focuses on hemodialysis at a treatment center."}, "Distal renal tubular acidosis": {"description": "Distal renal tubular acidosis is a disease that occurs when the kidneys do not properly remove acids from the blood into the urine. As a result, too much acid remains in the blood (called acidosis).", "Possible Complications": "Untreated, distal renal tubular acidosis can lead to any of the following conditions:Osteomalacia, Rickets, Nephrocalcinosis, Kidney stones, Electrolyte imbalances, such as low blood potassium level. ", "Symptoms": ["Confusion or decreased alertness", "Fatigue", "Impaired growth", "Increased breathing rate", "Kidney stones", "Nephrocalcinosis", "Osteomalacia", "Rickets", "Muscle weakness ", "Bone pain", "Decreased urine output", "Increased heart rate or irregular heartbeat", "Muscle cramps", "Pain in the back, flank, or abdomen", "Skeletal abnormalities"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam and ask about your symptoms.Tests that may be ordered include:Arterial blood gas, Blood chemistry, Urine pH, Urinalysis. ", "Treatment": "The goal is to restore normal acid level and electrolyte balance in the body. This will help correct bone disorders and reduce calcium buildup in the kidneys (nephrocalcinosis) and kidney stones. The underlying cause of distal renal tubular acidosis should be corrected if it can be identified.Medicines that may be prescribed include potassium citrate and sodium bicarbonate. These are alkaline medicines that help correct the acidic condition of the body. Sodium bicarbonate may correct the loss of potassium and calcium.", "Prevention": "There is no prevention for this disorder.", "Causes": "When the body performs its normal functions, it produces acid. If this acid is not removed or neutralized, the blood becomes too acidic. This can lead to electrolyte imbalances in the blood. It can also cause problems with normal function of some cells.The kidneys help control the body's acid level by removing acid from the blood and excreting it into the urine.Distal renal tubular acidosis (Type I RTA) is caused by a defect in the kidney tubes that causes acid to build up in the blood.Type I RTA is caused by a variety of conditions, including:Amyloidosis, Fabry disease (abnormal buildup in the body of a certain type of fatty substance), High blood calcium, Sickle cell disease, Sjogren syndrome, Systemic lupus erythematosus, Wilson disease, Use of certain medicines, such as amphotericin B, lithium, and analgesics. "}, "Diskitis": {"description": "Diskitis is swelling (inflammation) and irritation of the space between the bones of the spine (intervertebral disk space).", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:Persistent back pain (rare), Side effects of medications . ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Back pain", "Difficulty getting up and standing", "Increased curvature of the back", "Irritability", "Low-grade fever (less than 102 degrees Fahrenheit)", "Recent flu-like symptoms", "Refusal to sit up, stand, or walk (younger child)", "Stiffness in back "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam on your child and will ask about the child's medical history.Tests that may be ordered include any of the following:Bone scan, CBC, ESR, MRI of the spine, X-ray of the spine . ", "Treatment": "The goal is to treat the cause of the inflammation and reduce pain. Your child may receive antibiotics if the health care provider suspects an infection caused by bacteria. Autoimmune diseases are often treated with anti-inflammatory medications.If the condition does not improve, steroids may be given. But an infection should be ruled out first. Pain may be relieved with painkillers (analgesics) or nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDS). Talk to the health care provider about the best choice of medicines.Bed rest or using a brace to keep the back from moving\u00a0may be recommended in some cases.", "Causes": "Diskitis is an uncommon condition. It is usually seen in children younger than age 10.Diskitis can be caused by an infection from bacteria or a virus. Or, it can be caused by other inflammation, such as from autoimmune diseases.\u00a0Autoimmune diseases\u00a0are\u00a0conditions in which the immune system mistakenly attacks certain cells in the body. The upper back (thoracic) and low back (lumbar) disks are most commonly affected."}, "Diabetic ketoacidosis": {"description": "When fat breaks down, waste products called ketones build up in the body.", "Possible Complications": "Fluid buildup in the brain (cerebral edema), Heart attack and death of bowel tissue due to low blood pressure, Kidney failure. ", "Symptoms": ["Decreased alertness", "Deep, rapid breathing", "Dry skin and mouth", "Flushed face", "Frequent urination or thirst that lasts for a day or more", "Fruity-smelling breath", "Headache", "Muscle stiffness or aches", "Nausea and vomiting", "Stomach pain"], "Exams and Tests": "Ketone testing may be used in type 1 diabetes to screen for early ketoacidosis. The ketones test is usually done using a urine sample\u00a0or a blood sample. Ketone testing is usually done:When the blood sugar is higher than 240 mg/dL, During an illness such as pneumonia, heart attack, or stroke, When nausea or vomiting occur, During pregnancy . Other tests for ketoacidosis include:Amylase blood test, Arterial blood gas, Blood glucose test, Blood pressure measurement, Potassium blood test. This disease may also affect the results of the following tests:CO2, Magnesium blood test, Phosphorus blood test, Sodium blood test, Urine pH. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to correct the high blood sugar level with insulin. Another goal is to replace fluids lost through urination, loss of appetite,\u00a0and vomiting if you have these symptoms.If you have diabetes, it is likely your health care provider told you how to spot the warning signs of DKA. If you think you have DKA, test for ketones using urine strips or your glucose meter. If ketones are present, call your health care provider right away. Do not delay. Follow any instructions you are given.It is likely that\u00a0you will need to go to the hospital. There, you will receive insulin, fluids, and other treatment for DKA. Then doctors will find and treat the cause of DKA, such as an infection.", "Prevention": "If you have diabetes, learn to recognize the signs and symptoms of DKA. Know when to test for ketones, such as when you are sick.If you use an insulin pump, check often to see that insulin is flowing through the tubing. Make sure the tube is not blocked, kinked or disconnected from the pump.", "Causes": "As fat is broken down, acids called ketones build up in the blood and urine. In high levels, ketones are poisonous. This condition is known as ketoacidosis.Diabetic ketoacidosis is sometimes the first sign of type 1 diabetes in people who have not yet been diagnosed. It can also occur in someone who has already been diagnosed with type 1 diabetes. Infection, injury, a serious illness, missing doses of insulin shots, or surgery can lead to diabetic ketoacidosis in people with type 1 diabetes. People with type 2 diabetes can also develop ketoacidosis, but it is less common. It is usually triggered by uncontrolled blood sugar, missing doses of medications,\u00a0or a severe illness."}, "Diet - liver disease": {"description": "Some people\u00a0with liver disease must eat a special diet. This diet helps the liver function and protects it from working too hard."}, "Dehydration": {"description": "Dehydration can be mild, moderate, or severe, based on how much of your body's fluid is lost or not replaced. Severe dehydration is a life-threatening emergency.", "Possible Complications": "If untreated, severe dehydration may cause:Death, Permanent brain damage, Seizures. ", "Symptoms": ["Thirst", "Dry or sticky mouth", "Not urinating much", "Darker yellow urine", "Dry, cool skin", "Headache", "Muscle cramps ", "Not urinating, or very dark yellow or amber-colored urine", "Dry, shriveled skin", "Irritability or confusion", "Dizziness or lightheadedness", "Rapid heartbeat", "Breathing rapidly", "Sunken eyes", "Listlessness", "Shock (lack of blood flow through the body)", "Unconsciousness or delirium "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will look for these signs of dehydration:Low blood pressure, Blood pressure that drops when you stand up after lying down, White finger tips that do not return to a pink color after your doctor presses the fingertip, Skin that is not as elastic as normal. When your health care provider pinches it into a fold, it may slowly sag back into place. Normally, skin springs back right away., Rapid heart rate. Your doctor may do lab tests:Blood tests to check kidney function, Urine tests to see what may be causing dehydration, Other tests to see what may be causing dehydration (blood sugar test for diabetes) . ", "Treatment": "To treat dehydration:Try sipping water or sucking on ice cubes., Try drinking water or sports drinks that contain electrolytes., Do not take salt tablets. They can cause a serious complication., Learn what to eat if you have diarrhea.\r\n  . For more severe dehydration or heat emergency, you may need to stay in a hospital and receive fluid through a vein (IV). Your health care provider will also treat the cause of the dehydration.Dehydration caused by a stomach virus should get better on its own after a few days. ", "Prevention": "Drink plenty of fluids every day, even when you are well. Drink more when the weather is hot or you are exercising., If anyone in your family is ill, pay attention to how much they are able to drink. Pay close attention to children and older adults., Anyone with a fever, vomiting, or diarrhea should drink plenty of fluids. DO NOT wait for signs of dehydration., If you think you or someone in your family may become dehydrated, call your health care provider. Do this before the person becomes dehydrated. . ", "Causes": "You can become dehydrated if you lose too much fluid, don't drink enough water or fluids, or both. Your body may lose a lot of fluid from:Sweating too much, for example, from exercising in hot weather, Fever, Vomiting or diarrhea, Urinating too much (uncontrolled diabetes or some medications, like diuretics, can cause you to urinate a lot) . You might not drink enough fluids because:You don't feel like eating or drinking because you are sick, You are nauseated, You have a sore throat or mouth sores. Older adults and people with certain diseases, such as diabetes, are also at higher risk for dehydration."}, "Dementia - keeping safe in the home": {"description": "It is important to make sure the homes of people who have dementia are safe for them."}, "Dry skin": {"description": "Dry skin is most common in your lower legs, arms, sides of the abdomen (flanks), and thighs. The symptoms\u00a0of dry skin include:", "Causes": "Dry skin is common. It happens more often in the winter when cold air outside and heated air inside cause low humidity. Forced-air furnaces make skin even drier.The skin loses moisture and may crack and peel, or become irritated and inflamed. Bathing too frequently, especially with harsh soaps, may contribute to dry skin. Eczema may cause dry skin."}, "Dislocation": {"Symptoms": ["Accompanied by numbness or tingling at the joint or beyond it", "Intensely painful, especially if you try to use the joint or\u00a0put weight on it", "Limited in movement", "Swollen or bruised", "Visibly out of place, discolored, or misshapen"], "Prevention": "To help prevent injuries in children:Create a safe environment around your home., Pay careful attention to preventing falls by gating stairways and keeping windows closed and locked., Supervise children carefully. There is no substitute for close supervision, no matter how safe the environment or situation appears to be., Teach children how to be safe and look out for themselves.. To help prevent dislocations in adults:To avoid falls, do not stand on chairs, countertops, or other unstable objects., Eliminate throw rugs, especially\u00a0around the elderly., Wear protective gear when participating in contact sports.. For all age groups:Keep a first aid kit handy., Remove electrical cords from floors., Use handrails on staircases., Use nonskid mats on the bottom of bathtubs and\u00a0do not\u00a0use\u00a0bath oils.. ", "description": "A dislocated\u00a0joint is a joint where the bones are no longer in\u00a0their normal positions.", "Causes": "Dislocations are usually caused by a sudden impact to the joint. This usually occurs following a blow, fall, or other trauma."}, "Discipline": {"description": "Remember that a child cannot understand complicated explanations, so do not attempt to reason. Give the punishment immediately. If you wait too long the child will not connect the punishment with the behavior."}, "Doctor of medicine profession (MD)": {"description": "Certification: MDs who wish to specialize must complete an additional 3 - 9 years of postgraduate work in their specialty area, then pass board certification examinations. Doctors who claim to practice in one specialty should be board-certified in that specific area of practice."}, "Diskectomy": {"description": "Diskectomy is surgery to remove all or part of the cushion that helps support part of your spinal column. These cushions are called disks, and they separate your spinal bones (vertebrae)."}, "Decerebrate posture": {"description": "Decerebrate posture is an abnormal body posture that involves the arms and legs being held straight out, the toes being pointed downward, and the head and neck being arched backwards. The muscles are tightened and held rigidly. This type of posturing usually means there has been severe damage to the brain.", "Causes": "Bleeding in the brain from any cause (intracranial hemorrhage), Brain stem tumor, Cerebral infarction (stroke), Encephalopathy (brain problem due to drugs, poisoning, or infection), Head injury, Hepatic encephalopathy (brain problem due to liver failure), Increased pressure in the brain (intracranial hypertension) from any cause, Primary brain tumor, Secondary brain tumor. "}, "Drug-induced lupus erythematosus": {"description": "Drug-induced lupus erythematosus is an autoimmune disorder that is brought on by a reaction to a medicine.", "Possible Complications": "Infection, Thrombocytopenia purpura -- bleeding near the skin surface, resulting from a low number of platelets in the blood, Hemolytic anemia, Myocarditis, Pericarditis, Nephritis\u00a0. ", "Symptoms": ["Blurred vision", "Fever", "General ill feeling (malaise)", "Joint pain", "Joint swelling", "Loss of appetite", "Pleuritic chest pain", "Skin rashGets worse with sunlight, \"Butterfly\" rash across bridge of nose and cheeks. ", "Gets worse with sunlight", "\"Butterfly\" rash across bridge of nose and cheeks", "Weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider\u00a0will do a physical exam and listen to your chest with a stethoscope. The doctor may hear a sound called a heart friction rub or pleural friction rub.A skin exam shows a rash.Joints may be swollen and tender.Tests that may be done include:Antihistone antibody, Antinuclear antibody (ANA) panel, Complete blood count (CBC). A chest x-ray may show signs of pleuritis or pericarditis (inflammation around the lining of the lung or heart). An ECG may show that the heart is affected.", "Treatment": "Most of the time, symptoms go away within several days to weeks after stopping the medication that caused the condition.Treatment may include:Nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs) to treat arthritis and pleurisy, Corticosteroid creams to treat skin rashes, Antimalarial drugs (hydroxychloroquine) to treat skin and arthritis symptoms. If the condition is affecting your heart, kidney, or nervous system, your doctor may prescribe high doses of corticosteroids (prednisone, methylprednisolone) and immune system suppressants (azathioprine or cyclophosphamide). This is rare.Guard against too much sun exposure when the disease is active by wearing clothing and sunglasses and using sunscreen.", "Prevention": "Watch for signs of a reaction if you are taking any of the drugs that can cause this problem.", "Causes": "Drug-induced lupus erythematosus is similar to systemic lupus erythematosus (SLE). It is an autoimmune disorder. This means\u00a0your body attacks healthy tissue by mistake. It is caused by an overreaction\u00a0to a medicine.The most common medicines known to cause drug-induced lupus are: Isoniazid, Hydralazine, Procainamide . Other less common drugs may also cause the condition. These may include:Anti-seizure medications, Capoten, Chlorpromazine, Etanercept, Infliximab, Methyldopa, Minocycline, Penicillamine, Quinidine, Sulfasalazine . Symptoms tend to occur after taking the drug for at least 3 to 6 months."}, "Developmental disorders of the female reproductive tract": {"description": "Female reproductive organs include the vagina, ovaries, uterus, and cervix.", "Possible Complications": "Cloacal abnormalities can cause life-threatening complications at birth.Potential complications may develop if the diagnosis is made late or is wrong. Children with ambiguous genitalia who are assigned one gender may later be found to have internal organs related to the sex opposite from which they were raised. This can cause severe psychological distress.Undiagnosed problems in a girl's reproductive tract can lead to infertility and sexual difficulties.Other complications that occur later in life include:Endometriosis, Going into labor too early (preterm delivery), Painful abdominal lumps requiring surgery, Repeated miscarriages. ", "Symptoms": ["Breasts do not grow", "Cannot empty the bladder", "Lump in the stomach area, usually due to blood or mucus that cannot flow out", "Menstrual flow that occurs despite using a tampon (a sign of a second vagina)", "Monthly cramping or pain, without menstruation", "No menstruation (amenorrhea)", "Pain with sex", "Repeated miscarriages or preterm births (may be due to an abnormal uterus)"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor may notice signs of a developmental disorder right away. Such signs may include:Abnormal vagina, Abnormal or missing cervix, Bladder on the outside of the body, Genitals that are hard to identify as a girl or boy (ambiguous genitalia), Labia that are stuck together or unusual in size, No openings in the genital area or a single rectal opening, Swollen clitoris. The belly area may be swollen or a lump in the groin or abdomen may be felt. The doctor may notice the uterus does not feel normal.Tests may include:Endoscopy of the abdomen, Karyotyping (genetic testing), Hormone levels, especially testosterone and cortisol, Ultrasound or MRI of the pelvic area., Urine and serum electrolytes. ", "Treatment": "Doctors often recommend surgery for girls with developmental problems of the internal reproductive organs. For example, a blocked vagina can usually be corrected with surgery.If the baby girl is missing a vagina, the doctor may prescribe a dilator when the child reaches young adulthood. A dilator is a device that helps stretch or widen the area where the vagina is supposed to be. This nonsurgical process takes from 4 to 6 months. Surgery may also be done to create a new vagina. Surgery should be done when the young woman is able to use a dilator to keep the new vagina open.Doctors have reported good results with both surgical and nonsurgical techniques.Treatment of cloacal abnormalities usually involves multiple complex surgeries to fix any problems with the rectum, vagina, and urinary tract.If the birth defect causes life-threatening complications, the first surgery is done shortly after birth. Surgeries for other developmental reproductive disorders may also be done while the baby is an infant. Some surgeries may be delayed until the child is much older.Early recognition is important, particularly in cases of ambiguous genitalia. Careful consideration should be given before assigning a gender -- that means, before you decide that child is a boy or girl. Treatment should include counseling for the parents and, eventually, the child. For specific treatment information, see the articles on intersex and ambiguous genitalia.", "Prevention": "Pregnant women should be extremely careful not to handle any substances that contain male hormones. It is also important for pregnant women to check before taking any type of medication or supplements such as DHEA.However, development problems with a baby may still occur, even if the mother makes every effort to ensure a healthy pregnancy.", "Causes": "A baby starts to develop its reproductive organs between weeks 4 and 5 of pregnancy. This development continues until the 20th week of pregnancy.The development is a complex process. Many different things can interrupt the process. How severe your baby's problem is depends on when the interruption occurred. In general, the earlier development problems occur in the womb, the more serious the problem.Problems in the development of a girl's reproductive organs may be caused by:Broken or missing genes (genetic defect), Use of certain drugs during pregnancy. For example, some babies may have a genetic defect that prevents their body from producing a substance called 21-hydroxylase. If a developing baby girl lacks this substance, she will be born with a uterus, ovaries, and fallopian tubes, but her external genitals will look like those found on boys. See: Congenital adrenal hyperplasiaCertain drugs that the mother takes can pass into the baby's bloodstream and interfere with organ development. One drug known to do this is diethylstilbestrol (DES). Doctors once prescribed this medicine to pregnant women to prevent miscarriage and early labor. However, scientists learned that baby girls born to women who took this drug had an abnormally shaped uterus. The drug also increased the daughters' chances of developing a rare form of vaginal cancer.Sometimes, a developmental disorder can be seen as soon as the baby is born. It may cause life-threatening conditions in the newborn. Other times, the condition is not diagnosed until the girl is older.The reproductive tract develops close to the urinary tract and kidneys. It also develops at the same time as several other organs. As a result, developmental problems in the female reproductive tract sometimes occur with problems in other areas, including the urinary tract, kidneys, and lower spine.Developmental disorders of the female reproductive tract include intersex and ambiguous genitalia. See the specific articles for information on these conditions.Other developmental disorders of the female reproductive tract include:Cloacal abnormalities -- The cloaca is a tube-like structure. In the early stages of a baby's development, the urinary tract, rectum, and vagina all empty into this one tube. But, later in development, the three areas separate and have their own openings. If the cloaca persists as a baby girl grows in the womb, all the openings do not form. For example, a baby may be born with only one opening on the bottom of the body near the rectal area. Urine and feces cannot drain out of the body. This can cause severe pain, stomach swelling, and breathing problems. Some cloacal abnormalities may cause a baby girl to look like she has a male's penis. These birth defects are rare., Problems with outer (external) genitals -- Developmental problems may lead to a swollen clitoris or fused labia (when the folds of tissue around the opening of the vagina are joined together). Most other problems of the outer genitals are related to intersex or ambiguous genitalia., Imperforate hymen -- The hymen is a thin tissue that partly covers the opening to the vagina. An imperforate hymen completely blocks the vaginal opening. This often leads to painful swelling of the vagina. Sometimes, the hymen has only a very small opening or tiny small holes. This problem may not be discovered until puberty. Some baby girls are born without a hymen., Ovarian problems -- A baby girl may have an extra ovary, extra tissue attached to an ovary, or structures called ovotestes that have both male and female tissue., Uterus and cervix problems-- A baby girl may be born with an extra cervix and uterus, a half-formed uterus, or a blockage of the uterus. Usually, girls born with half a uterus and half a vagina are missing the kidney on the same side of the body., Vaginal problems-- A baby girl may be born without a vagina or have the vaginal opening blocked by a layer of cells that are higher up in the vagina than where the hymen is. A missing vagina is most often due to Mayer-Rokitansky-K\u00fcster-Hauser syndrome. In this syndrome, the baby is missing part or all of the internal reproductive organs (uterus, cervix, and fallopian tubes). Other abnormalities include having two vaginas or a vagina that opens into the urinary tract, a heart shaped uterus, and a uterus with a wall in the middle of the cavity\r\n. "}, "Diaphragmatic hernia": {"description": "A diaphragmatic hernia is a birth defect in which there is an abnormal opening in the diaphragm. The diaphragm is the muscle between the chest and abdomen that helps you breathe. The opening allows part of the organs from the belly (stomach, spleen, liver, and intestines) to go up into the chest cavity near the lungs.", "Possible Complications": "Lung infections, Other congenital problems. ", "Symptoms": ["Bluish colored skin due to lack of oxygen", "Rapid breathing (tachypnea)", "Fast heart rate (tachycardia) "], "Exams and Tests": "The pregnant mother may have a large amount of amniotic fluid. Fetal ultrasound may show abdominal organs in the chest cavity.An exam of the infant shows: Irregular chest movements, Lack of breath sounds on side with the hernia, Bowel sounds that are heard in the chest, Abdomen that feels less full when touched . A chest x-ray may show abdominal organs in chest cavity.", "Treatment": "A diaphragmatic hernia repair is an emergency that requires surgery. Surgery is done to place the abdominal organs into the proper position and repair the opening in the diaphragm.The infant will need breathing support during the recovery period. Some infants are placed on a heart/lung bypass machine. This gives the lungs a chance to recover and expand after surgery.If a diaphragmatic hernia is diagnosed during pregnancy (around 24 to 28 weeks), fetal surgery may be an option.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention.", "Causes": "A diaphragmatic hernia is a rare defect that occurs while the baby is developing in the womb. The abdominal organs, such as the stomach, small intestine, spleen, part of the liver, and the kidney, may take up part of the chest cavity. This prevents the lung from growing normally. It is more common on the left side. Having a parent or sibling with the condition slightly increases your risk."}, "Devices for hearing loss": {"description": "There are many different devices that can improve your ability to communicate. This can help reduce stress for you and those around you. These devices can improve your life in numerous ways."}, "Developmental reading disorder": {"description": "It is also called dyslexia. ", "Possible Complications": "DRD may lead to:Problems in school, including behavior problems, Loss of self-esteem, Reading problems that continue, which may affect job performance. ", "Symptoms": ["Difficulty determining the meaning\u00a0of a simple sentence", "Difficulty learning to recognize written words", "Difficulty rhyming"], "Exams and Tests": "It is important for a doctor to rule out other causes of learning disabilities, especially reading disability. Emotional disorders, intellectual disability, brain diseases, and certain cultural and education factors can cause learning disabilities.Before diagnosing DRD, the health care provider will:Perform a complete medical exam, including a neurological exam, Ask questions about the person's developmental, social, and school performance, Ask if anyone else in the family has had dyslexia. Psychoeducational testing and psychological assessment may be done.", "Treatment": "Every person with DRD requires a different strategy. An individual education plan should be created for each child with the condition.The following may be recommended:Extra learning assistance, called remedial instruction, Private, individual tutoring, Special day classes. Positive reinforcement is important as many students with learning disabilities have poor self-esteem. Psychological counseling may be helpful.", "Prevention": "Learning disorders tend to run in families.\u00a0It is important to notice and recognize the warning signs. The earlier the disorder is discovered, the better the outcome. ", "Causes": "Developmental reading disorder (DRD), or dyslexia, occurs when there is a problem in areas of the brain that help interpret language. It is not caused by vision problems. The disorder is a specific information processing problem. It\u00a0does not interfere with one's ability to think or to understand complex ideas. Most people with DRD have normal intelligence. Many have above-average intelligence.DRD may appear with developmental writing disorder and developmental arithmetic disorder. The condition often runs in families."}, "Dry socket": {"Symptoms": ["Severe pain 1 to 3 days after the tooth is pulled", "Pain that radiates from the socket to your ear, eye, temple, or neck on the same side that your tooth was pulled", "An empty socket with a missing blood clot ", "Bad taste in your mouth ", "Bad breath or a terrible smell coming from your mouth", "Slight fever"], "description": "Dry socket occurs when the clot is lost or does not\u00a0form well. The bone and nerves are exposed to the air. This causes pain and delays healing.", "Treatment": "Your dentist will treat the dry socket by:Cleaning out the socket to flush out food or other materials, Filling the socket with a medicated dressing or paste, Having you come in often to have the dressing changed. Your dentist may also decide to:Start you on antibiotics, Have you rinse with salt water or special mouthwash, Give you a prescription for pain medicine or irrigation solution. "}, "Drug-induced hepatitis": {"description": "Other types of hepatitis include:", "Possible Complications": "Rarely, drug-induced hepatitis can lead to liver failure. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Dark urine", "Diarrhea", "Fatigue", "Fever", "Headache", "Jaundice", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea and vomiting", "Rash", "White or clay-colored stools "], "Exams and Tests": "You will have blood tests to check liver function. Liver enzymes will be higher if you have the condition.Your provider will do a physical exam to check for an enlarged liver and abdominal tenderness in the right upper part of the belly area. A rash or fever may be part of some drug reactions that affect the liver.", "Treatment": "The only specific treatment for most cases of liver damage caused by taking a drug is to stop the drug that caused the problem. However, if you took high doses of acetaminophen, treatment should be started as soon as possible after you develop hepatitis. You should rest during the first phase of drug-induced hepatitis, when the symptoms are most severe. You may need to get fluids through a vein if nausea and vomiting are very bad.People with acute hepatitis should avoid heavy exercise, alcohol, acetaminophen, and any other substances that harm the liver.", "Prevention": "Never use more than the recommended dose of over-the-counter medicines containing acetaminophen (Tylenol).DO NOT take these medicines if you drink heavily or regularly or talk to your provider about safe doses. Always tell your doctor about all the medicines you take. This is very important if you have liver disease. You should avoid the following medicines if you have liver disease:Acetaminophen, Phenytoin . Talk to your provider about other medicines you may need to avoid. Your provider can tell you which medicines are safe for you. ", "Causes": "The liver helps the body break down certain medicines. These include some drugs that you buy over-the-counter or your health care provider prescribes for you. However, the process is slower in some people. This can make you more likely to get liver damage.Some drugs can cause hepatitis with small doses, even if the liver breakdown system is normal. Large doses of many medicines can damage a normal liver.Many different drugs can cause drug-induced hepatitis.Painkillers and fever reducers that contain acetaminophen are a common cause of liver inflammation. These medicines can damage the liver when taken in doses that are not much greater than the recommended dose. People who already have liver disease are most likely to have this problem.Nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs), such as ibuprofen, diclofenac, and naproxen, may also cause drug-induced hepatitis.Other drugs that can lead to liver inflammation include:Amiodarone, Anabolic steroids, Birth control pills, Chlorpromazine, Erythromycin, Halothane (a type of anesthesia), Methyldopa, Isoniazid, Methotrexate, Statins, Sulfa drugs, Tetracyclines, Amoxicillin-clavulanate, Some anti-seizure medicines . "}, "Drugs that may cause impotence": {"description": "Recreational drugs:"}, "Drinking water safely during cancer treatment": {"description": "During and right after your cancer treatment, your body cannot protect itself against infections. Tiny germs can be in water, even when it looks clean. You need to be careful where you get your water from. This includes water for drinking, cooking, and brushing your teeth. Ask your doctor or nurse about special care you should take."}, "Delta agent (Hepatitis D)": {"description": "Delta agent is a type of virus called hepatitis D. It causes symptoms only in people who also have hepatitis B infection.", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:Chronic active hepatitis, Fulminant hepatitis . ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Dark-colored urine", "Fatigue", "Jaundice", "Joint pain", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea", "Vomiting "], "Exams and Tests": "You may need the following tests:Anti-delta agent antibody, Liver biopsy, Liver enzymes (blood test) . ", "Treatment": "Many of the medicines used to treat hepatitis B are not helpful for treating hepatitis D.You may receive a medicine called alpha interferon for up to 12 months if you have a long-term HDV infection. A liver transplant for end-stage chronic hepatitis B may be effective.", "Prevention": "Steps to prevent the condition include:Detect and treat hepatitis B infection as soon as possible to help prevent hepatitis D., Avoid intravenous drug (IV) abuse. If you use IV drugs, avoid sharing needles., Get vaccinated against hepatitis B.. Adults who are at high risk for hepatitis B infection and all children should get this vaccine. If you do not get Hepatitis B, you cannot get Hepatitis D.", "Causes": "Hepatitis D virus (HDV) is found only in people who carry the hepatitis B virus. HDV may make liver disease worse in people who have either recent (acute) or long-term (chronic) hepatitis B. It can even cause symptoms in people who carry hepatitis B virus but who never had symptoms.Hepatitis D infects about 15 million people worldwide. It occurs in a small number of people who carry hepatitis B.Risk factors include:Abusing intravenous (IV) or injection drugs, Being infected while pregnant (the mother can pass the virus to the baby), Carrying the hepatitis B virus, Men having sexual intercourse with other men, Receiving many blood transfusions . "}, "Dependent personality disorder": {"description": "Dependent personality disorder is a\u00a0mental health\u00a0condition in which people depend too much on others to meet their emotional and physical needs.", "Possible Complications": "Alcohol or drug abuse, Depression, Increased likelihood of physical, emotional, or sexual abuse. ", "Symptoms": ["Avoiding being alone", "Avoiding personal responsibility", "Becoming easily hurt by criticism or disapproval", "Becoming overly focused on fears of being abandoned", "Becoming very passive in relationships", "Feeling very upset or helpless when relationships end", "Having difficulty making decisions without support from others", "Having problems expressing disagreements with others"], "Exams and Tests": "Dependent personality disorder is diagnosed based on a psychological evaluation\u00a0that assesses\u00a0the history and severity of the symptoms.", "Treatment": "Talk therapy is considered to be the most effective treatment. The aim is to help people with this condition make more independent choices in life. Medicines may help treat other mental health\u00a0conditions, such as anxiety or depression, that occur along with this disorder.", "Causes": "Cause of\u00a0dependent personality\u00a0disorder\u00a0is unknown. The disorder usually begins in childhood.\u00a0It is one of the most common personality disorders and is equally common in men and women."}, "Disseminated tuberculosis": {"description": "Disseminated tuberculosis (TB) is a contagious bacterial infection in which TB bacteria has spread from the lungs to other parts of the body through the blood or lymph system.", "Possible Complications": "Complications of disseminated TB can include:Adult respiratory distress syndrome (ARDS), Liver inflammation\u00a0, Lung failure, Return of the disease . Medicines used to treat TB\u00a0can cause side effects, including:Changes in vision, Orange- or brown-colored tears and urine, Rash, Liver inflammation. A vision test may be done before treatment so your doctor can monitor any changes in the health of\u00a0your eyes.", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain or swelling", "Chills", "Cough and shortness of breath", "Fatigue", "Fever", "General discomfort, uneasiness, or ill feeling (malaise)", "Joint pain", "Pale skin due to anemia (pallor)", "Sweating", "Swollen glands", "Weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will perform a physical exam. This may show:Swollen liver, Swollen lymph nodes, Swollen spleen. Tests that may be ordered include:Biopsies and cultures of affected organs or tissues, Bronchoscopy for biopsy or culture, Chest x-ray, CT scan of the affected area, Fundoscopy may reveal retinal lesions, Interferon-gamma release blood test, such as the QFT-Gold test to test for TB infection, Lung biopsy, Mycobacterial culture of bone marrow or blood, Pleural biopsy, Tuberculin skin test (PPD test), Sputum examination and cultures, Thoracentesis. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to cure the infection with medicines that fight the TB bacteria. Treatment of disseminated TB involves a combination of several medicines (usually four). All medicines are continued until lab tests show which work best.You may need to take many different pills at different times of the day for 6 months or longer. It is very important that you take the pills the way your health care provider instructed.When people do not take their TB medicines as instructed, the infection can become much more difficult to treat. The TB bacteria can become resistant to treatment. This means the medicines no longer work.When there is concern that a patient may not take all the medicines as directed, a health care provider may need to watch the person take the prescribed medicines. This approach is called directly observed therapy. In this case, medicines may be given 2 or 3 times a week, as prescribed by a doctor.You may need to stay at home or be admitted to a hospital for 2 to 4 weeks to avoid spreading the disease to others until you are no longer contagious. Your doctor or nurse is required by law to report your TB illness to the local health department. Your health care team will ensure that you receive the best care.", "Prevention": "TB is a preventable disease, even in those who have been exposed to an infected person. Skin testing for TB is used in high-risk populations or in people who may have been exposed to TB, such as health care workers.People who have been exposed to TB should be skin tested immediately and have a follow-up test at a later date, if the first test is negative.A positive skin test means you have come into contact with the TB bacteria. It does not mean that you have active disease or are contagious. Talk to your doctor about how to prevent getting tuberculosis.Prompt treatment is extremely important in controlling the spread of TB from those who have active TB disease to those who have never been infected with TB.Some countries with a high incidence of TB give people a vaccination (called BCG) to prevent TB. But, the effectiveness of this vaccine is controversial and it is not routinely used in the United States.People who have had BCG may still be skin tested for TB. Discuss the test results (if positive) with your doctor.", "Causes": "Tuberculosis (TB) infection can develop after breathing in droplets sprayed into the air from a cough or sneeze by someone infected with the Mycobacterium tuberculosis bacterium. The resulting lung infection is called primary TB.The usual site of TB is the lungs (pulmonary TB), but other organs can be involved. In the U.S., most people with primary tuberculosis get better and have no further evidence of disease. Disseminated TB develops in the small number of infected people whose immune systems do not successfully contain the primary infection.Disseminated disease can occur within weeks of the primary infection. Sometimes, it does not occur until years after you become infected. You are more likely to get this type of TB if you have a weakened immune system due to disease (such as AIDS) or certain medications. Infants and the elderly are also at higher risk.Your risk of catching TB increases if you:Are around people who have the disease (such as during overseas travel), Live in crowded or unclean conditions, Have poor nutrition . The following factors can increase the rate of TB infection in a population:Increase in HIV infections, Increase in number of homeless people (poor environment and nutrition), The appearance of drug-resistant strains of TB. "}, "Diarrhea in infants": {"description": "Your baby may have diarrhea if you see changes in his stool, such as:"}, "Dementia - what to ask your doctor ": {"description": "You are caring for someone who has dementia. Below are some questions you may want to ask your doctor or nurse to help you take care of that person."}, "Drug-induced diarrhea": {"Prevention": "To prevent diarrhea due to antibiotic use, talk to your doctor about taking supplements containing healthy bacteria (probiotics). Some of these products may reduce the risk of diarrhea. Keep taking these supplements for a few days after you finish your antibiotics.", "description": "Drug-induced diarrhea is loose, watery stools that occurs when you take certain medicines.", "Causes": "Nearly all medicines may cause diarrhea as a side effect. The drugs listed below, however, are more likely to cause diarrhea.Laxatives are meant to cause diarrhea. They work either by drawing water into the gut or by causing the muscles of the intestines to contract., However, taking too much of a laxative can cause diarrhea that is a problem. . Antacids that have magnesium in them may also cause diarrhea or make it worse.Antibiotics also can produce diarrhea.Normally, the intestines have many different bacteria. They keep each other in balance. Antibiotics destroy some of these bacteria, which allows other types to grow too much., In some cases, antibiotics can allow a type of bacteria called Clostridium difficile to grow too much. This can lead to severe, watery, and often bloody diarrhea called pseudomembranous colitis.. Many other drugs may cause diarrhea:Chemotherapy medicines used to treat cancer, Drugs used to treat heartburn and stomach ulcers, such asomeprazole (Prilosec), esomeprazole (Nexium), lansoprazole (Prevacid), rabeprazole (AcipHex), pantoprazole (Protonix), cimetidine (Tagamet), ranitidine (Zantac), and nizatidine (Axid), Medicines that suppress the immune system (such as mycophenolate), NSAIDs used to treat pain and arthritis, such as ibuprofen and naproxen. Some herbal teas contain senna or other \"natural\" laxatives that can cause diarrhea. Other vitamins, minerals, or supplements may also cause diarrhea."}, "Duchenne muscular dystrophy": {"description": "Duchenne muscular dystrophy is an inherited disorder that involves muscle weakness, which quickly gets worse.", "Possible Complications": "Cardiomyopathy (can also occur in female carriers, who should also be screened), Congestive heart failure (rare), Deformities, Heart arrhythmias (rare), Mental impairment (varies, usually minimal), Permanent, progressive disability, including decreased mobility and decreased ability to care for self, Pneumonia or other respiratory infections, Respiratory failure . ", "Symptoms": ["Fatigue", "Learning difficulties (the IQ can be below 75)\r\n  ", "Intellectual disability (possible, but does not get worse over time)", "Begins in the legs and pelvis, but also occurs less severely in the arms, neck, and other areas of the body", "Problems with motor skills (running, hopping, jumping)", "Frequent falls", "Trouble getting up from a lying position or climbing stairs", "Weakness quickly gets worse", "Ability to walk may be lost by age 12, and the child\u00a0will have\u00a0to use a wheelchair", "Breathing difficulties and heart disease usually start by age 20"], "Exams and Tests": "A complete nervous system (neurological), heart, lung, and muscle exam may show:Abnormal heart muscle (cardiomyopathy), Congestive heart failure or irregular heart rhythm (arrhythmia), Deformities of the chest and back (scoliosis), Enlarged muscles of the calves, buttocks, and shoulders (around age 4 or 5). These muscles are eventually replaced by fat and connective tissue (pseudohypertrophy)., Loss of muscle mass (wasting), Muscle contractures in the heels, legs, Muscle deformities, Respiratory disorders, including pneumonia and swallowing with food or fluid passing into the lungs (in late stages of the disease) . Tests may include:Electromyography (EMG), Genetic tests, Muscle biopsy, Serum CPK. ", "Treatment": "There is no known cure for Duchenne muscular dystrophy. Treatment aims to control symptoms to\u00a0improve quality of life. Steroid drugs can slow the loss of muscle strength. They may be started when the child is diagnosed or when muscle strength begins to decline.Other treatments may include:Albuterol--a drug used for people with asthma, Amino acids, Carnitine, Coenzyme Q10, Creatine, Fish oil, Green tea extracts, Vitamin E. However, the effects of these treatments have not been proven. Stem cells and gene therapy may be used in the future.Activity is encouraged. Inactivity (such as bedrest) can\u00a0make the muscle disease worse. Physical therapy may help to maintain muscle strength and function. Speech therapy is often needed.Other treatments may include:Assisted ventilation (used during the day or night), Drugs to help heart function, such as angiotensin-converting-enzyme inhibitors, beta-blockers, and diuretics, Orthopedic appliances (such as braces and wheelchairs) to improve mobility, Proton pump inhibitors (for people with gastroesophageal reflux). Several new treatments are being studied in trials.", "Prevention": "People with a family history of the disorder may want to seek genetic counseling. Genetic studies done during pregnancy are very accurate in detecting Duchenne muscular dystrophy. ", "Causes": "Duchenne muscular dystrophy is a form of muscular dystrophy. It worsens quickly. Other muscular dystrophies (including Becker's muscular dystrophy) get worse much more slowly.Duchenne muscular dystrophy is caused by a defective gene for dystrophin (a protein in the muscles). However, it often occurs in people without a known family history of the condition.Because of the way the disease is inherited, it usually affects boys. The sons of females who are carriers of the disease (women\u00a0with a defective gene, but no symptoms themselves) each have a 50% chance of having the disease. The daughters each have a 50% chance of being carriers. Very rarely, a girl can be affected by the disease.Duchenne muscular dystrophy occurs in about 1 out of every 3,600 male infants. Because this is an inherited disorder, risks include a family history of Duchenne muscular dystrophy."}, "Dementia - behavior and sleep problems": {"description": "People with dementia often have certain problems when it gets dark at the end of the day and into the night. This problem is called sundowning. The problems that get worse include:"}, "De Quervain tendinitis": {"description": "A tendon is thick, bendable tissue that connects muscle to bone. Two tendons run from the back of your thumb down the side of your wrist. De Quervain tendinitis is caused when these tendons are swollen and irritated."}, "Diabetes - low blood sugar - self-care": {"description": "Hypoglycemia - self-care"}, "Drug-induced pulmonary disease": {"description": "Drug-induced pulmonary disease is lung disease brought on by a bad reaction to a medicine.", "Possible Complications": "Diffuse interstitial pulmonary fibrosis, Hypoxemia (low blood oxygen), Respiratory failure. ", "Symptoms": ["Bloody sputum", "Chest pain", "Cough", "Fever", "Shortness of breath", "Wheezing"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam and listen to your chest and lungs with a stethoscope. Abnormal breath sounds may be heard.Tests that may be done include:Arterial blood gases, Autoimmune blood tests, Blood chemistry, Bronchoscopy, Complete blood count with blood differential, Chest CT scan, Chest x-ray, Lung biopsy (in rare cases), Lung function tests, Thoracentesis (if pleural effusion is present). ", "Treatment": "The first step is to stop the\u00a0medicine that is causing the problem. Other treatments depend on your specific symptoms. For example, you may need oxygen until the drug-induced lung disease improves. Anti-inflammatory medicines called steroids are sometimes used to quickly reverse the lung inflammation.", "Prevention": "Note any past reaction you have had to a medicine, so that you can avoid the medicine in the future. Wear a medical alert bracelet if you have known drug reactions. Stay away from illegal drugs to prevent many drug-induced lung diseases.", "Causes": "Many types of lung injury can result from medicines. It is usually impossible to predict who will develop lung disease from a medicine.Types of lung problems or diseases that may be caused by medicines include:Allergic reactions -- asthma, hypersensitivity pneumonitis, or eosinophilic pneumonia, Bleeding into the lung air sacks, called alveoli (alveolar hemorrhage), Bronchitis, Damage to lung tissue (interstitial fibrosis), Drugs that cause the immune system to mistakenly attack and destroy healthy body tissue, such as drug-induced lupus erythematosus, Granulomatous lung disease -- a type of inflammation in the lungs, Inflammation of the lung air sacks (pneumonitis or infiltration), Lung vasculitis (inflammation of lung blood vessels), Lymph node swelling, Mediastinitis, Pulmonary edema, Pleural effusion. Many\u00a0medicines are known to cause lung disease in some people, including:Antibiotics, such as nitrofurantoin and sulfa drugs, Heart medicines, such as amiodarone, Chemotherapy drugs such as bleomycin, cyclophosphamide, and methotrexate, Illegal drugs. "}, "Depression - overview": {"description": "Clinical depression is a mood disorder in which feelings of sadness, loss, anger, or frustration interfere with everyday life for weeks or more.", "Causes": "Depression often runs in families. This may be due to your genes, behaviors you learn at home, or your environment. Depression may be triggered by stressful or unhappy life events. Often, it is a combination of these things.Many factors can bring on depression, including:Alcohol or drug abuse, Medical conditions, such as cancer or long-term (chronic) pain, Stressful life events, such as job loss, divorce, or death of a spouse or other family member, Social isolation (a common cause of depression in older adults). "}, "Dry eyes": {"description": "Dry eyes are caused by a lack of tears. Tears are necessary for the normal lubrication of your eyes and to wash away particles and foreign bodies.", "Causes": "Common causes of dry eyes include:Aging, Dry environment or workplace (wind, air conditioning), Sun exposure, Smoking or second-hand smoke exposure, Cold or allergy medicines, An eye injury or other problem with your eyes or eyelids (like bulging eyes), Sjogren's syndrome -- includes dry eyes, mouth, and mucus membranes, and often rheumatoid arthritis or other joint disorder, Previous eye surgery. "}, "Distal median nerve dysfunction": {"description": "A common type of distal median nerve dysfunction is carpal tunnel syndrome.", "Possible Complications": "Deformity of the hand (rare), Partial or complete loss of hand movement, Partial or complete loss of sensation in the fingers, Recurrent or unnoticed injury to the hand. ", "Symptoms": ["Pain in the wrist or hand that may be severe and wake you up at night, and that may be felt in other areas, such as the upper arm (this is called referred pain)\u00a0", "Sensation changes in the thumb and pointer (index), middle, and part of the ring fingers, such as a\u00a0burning feeling, decreased sensation, numbness, and\u00a0tingling", "Weakness of the hand that causes you to drop things or\u00a0have difficulty grasping objects or buttoning a shirt "], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor will examine your wrist and ask questions about your medical history. The examination may show decreased sensation in the thumb side of the hand. This is called the \"radial\" side. There may be weakness of the thumb and difficulty using it to pinch.Tests that reveal distal median nerve dysfunction may include:Electromyogram (EMG), Nerve conduction tests, Neuromuscular ultrasound, Nerve biopsy (rarely needed) . Tests are guided by the suspected cause of the nerve\u00a0dysfunction, which is based on your history, symptoms, and the way symptoms developed. They may include various blood tests, x-rays, imaging scans, or other tests and procedures.", "Treatment": "Treatment is aimed at correcting the underlying cause.If the median nerve is affected by carpal tunnel syndrome, a wrist splint can reduce further injury to the nerve and help relieve symptoms. Wearing the splint at night\u00a0will give the area a rest and allow inflammation to decrease. An injection into the wrist may help with symptoms, but it won't fix the underlying problem.In some cases, no treatment is required and recovery happens on its own. Over-the-counter or prescription medication may be needed to control nerve pain (neuralgia).If other nerves are also affected, it is necessary to look for an underlying medical problem that can affect nerves. Medical conditions such as diabetes and kidney disease can damage nerves. In these cases, treatment is directed at the medical condition.Physical therapy exercises may help some peoplemaintain muscle strength. Orthopedic assistance may maximize the ability to use the hand. Such therapy may involve braces, splints, or other appliances. Vocational counseling, occupational therapy, occupational changes, job retraining, or other measures may be recommended.Some patients with carpal tunnel syndrome may need surgery. See: Carpal tunnel release", "Prevention": "Prevention varies depending on the cause. In patients with underlying diabetes, controlling blood sugar may reduce the risk of developing nerve disorders.In occupations that require repetitive wrist movements, a change in the way the job is performed may be necessary. Frequent breaks in activity, \"wrist rests\" on keyboards, and other measures may reduce the risk of distal median nerve dysfunction. When possible, avoid prolonged repetitive movement of the wrist.", "Causes": "Dysfunction of one nerve group, such as the distal median nerve, is called a mononeuropathy. Mononeuropathy means there is a local cause of the nerve damage, although occasionally body-wide (systemic) disorders may cause isolated nerve damage.Distal median nerve dysfunction occurs when the nerve is inflamed, trapped, or injured by trauma. The most common reason is trapping (entrapment), which puts pressure on the nerve where it passes through a narrow area. Wrist fractures may injure the median nerve directly or may increase the risk for trapping a nerve later on.Inflammation of the tendons (tendonitis) or joints (arthritis) can also cause nerve compression. Some repetitive movements increase the chance of developing carpal tunnel entrapment.Conditions that affect connective tissue or cause deposits to form in tissue can block blood flow and lead to nerve compression. Such conditions include:Acromegaly, Diabetes, Hypothyroidism, Kidney disease, Multiple myeloma, Pregnancy. In some cases, no cause can be identified. Diabetes can make this condition worse. "}, "Dislocated shoulder - aftercare": {"description": "When you have a partly dislocated shoulder, it means only part of the ball is out of the socket. This is called a shoulder subluxation."}, "Double inlet left ventricle ": {"description": "Double inlet left ventricle (DILV) is a heart defect that is present from birth (congenital). It affects the valves and chambers of the heart. Babies born with this condition have only one working pumping chamber (ventricle) in their heart.", "Possible Complications": "Complications of DILV include:Clubbing (thickening of the nail beds) on the toes and fingers (late sign), Congestive heart failure, Frequent pneumonia, Heart rhythm problems. ", "Symptoms": ["Becoming tired easily, especially during feeding", "Bluish color to the skin and lips (cyanosis) due to low oxygen in the blood", "Failure to gain weight and grow", "Pale skin (pallor)", "Poor feeding", "Sweating", "Swollen legs or abdomen", "Trouble breathing "], "Exams and Tests": "Signs of DILV may include:Abnormal heart rhythm, as seen on an electrocardiogram, Buildup of fluid around the lungs, Heart failure, Heart murmur, Rapid heartbeat . Tests to diagnose DILV may include:Chest x-ray, Measurement of the electrical activity in the heart (electrocardiogram, or ECG), Passing a thin, flexible tube into the heart to examine the arteries (cardiac catheterization), Ultrasound exam of the heart (echocardiogram), Using magnets to create images of the heart (MRI) . ", "Treatment": "Surgery is needed to improve blood circulation through the body and into the lungs. The most common surgeries to treat DILV are a series of two to three operations. These surgeries are similar to the ones used to treat hypoplastic left heart syndrome and tricuspid atresia.The first surgery may be needed when the baby is only a few days old. In most cases, the baby can go home from the hospital afterward. The child will most often need to take medicines every day and be closely followed by a pediatric cardiologist. The child\u2019s doctor will determine when the second stage of surgery should be done.The next surgery (or first surgery, if the baby didn't need a procedure as a newborn) is called the bidirectional Glenn shunt or Hemifontan procedure. This surgery is usually done when the child is 4 - 6 months old.After the child has had the above operations, he or she may still look blue (cyanotic). The final step is called the Fontan procedure. This surgery is most often done when the child is 18 months - 3 years old. After this final step, the baby is no longer cyanotic.The Fontan operation does not create normal circulation in the body. However, it improves circulation enough for the child\u00a0to live and grow. A child may need more surgeries for other defects, or to extend survival while waiting for the Fontan procedure.Your child may need to take medicines before and after surgery. These may include:Anticoagulants to prevent blood clotting, ACE inhibitors to reduce blood pressure, Digoxin to help the heart contract, Diuretics . For the most severe cases of DILV, a heart transplant may be recommended.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention.", "Causes": "DILV is one of several heart defects known as single (or common) ventricle defects. People with this condition generally have a large left ventricle (the pumping chamber of the heart that supplies the body with blood), and a small right ventricle (the pumping chamber that supplies the lungs with blood).In the normal heart, the right and left lower chambers (ventricles) receive blood from the right and left upper chambers (atria). Oxygen-poor blood returning from the body flows to the right atrium and right ventricle. The right ventricle then pumps blood to the pulmonary artery. This is the blood vessel that carries blood to the lungs to pick up oxygen.The blood with fresh oxygen returns to the left atrium and left ventricle. The aorta then carries oxygen-rich blood to the rest of the body from the left ventricle.However, in people with DILV, only the left lower heart chamber is developed, and both upper chambers carry blood into this ventricle. This means that oxygen-rich blood mixes with oxygen-poor blood. The mixture is then pumped into both the body and the lungs.DILV can happen if the large blood vessels leading to the heart are in the wrong positions. (The aorta leads from the small right ventricle and the pulmonary artery leads from the left ventricle.) It can also occur when the arteries are in the normal position and lead from the usual ventricles. In this case, blood flows from the left to right ventricle through a hole between the chambers called a ventricular septal defect (VSD). Double inlet left ventricle is very rare. The exact cause is unknown. The problem most likely occurs early in the pregnancy, when the baby's heart develops. People with DILV often also have other heart problems, such as:Coarctation of the aorta, Pulmonary atresia, Pulmonary valve stenosis. "}, "Doctor of osteopathic medicine": {"description": "A doctor of osteopathic medicine (D.O.) is a physician licensed to practice medicine, perform surgery, and prescribe medication."}, "Dementia and driving": {"description": "If your loved one has dementia, deciding when they can no longer drive may be difficult. They may react in different ways."}, "Depression - stopping your medicines": {"description": "Antidepressants are prescription medicines you may take to help with depression, anxiety, or pain. Like any medicine, there are reasons you may take antidepressants for a while and then consider no longer taking them."}, "Drug-induced hypertension": {"description": "Drug-induced hypertension is high blood pressure caused by using a chemical substance, drug, or medication.", "Causes": "Blood pressure is determined by the:Amount of blood the heart pumps, Condition of the heart valves, Pulse rate, Pumping power of the heart, Size and condition of the arteries. There are several types of high blood pressure. Essential hypertension has no cause that can be found., Secondary hypertension occurs because of another disorder., Drug-induced hypertension is a form of secondary hypertension caused by a response to medication.. Drugs that can cause hypertension include:Acetaminophen, Alcohol, amphetamines, ecstasy (MDMA and derivatives), and cocaine, Antidepressants (including venlafaxine, bupropion, and desipramine), Caffeine (including the caffeine in coffee and energy drinks), Corticosteroids, Cyclosporine, Erythropoietin, Estrogens (including birth control pills) and other hormones, Many over-the-counter medications such as cough/cold and asthma medications -- particularly when the cough/cold medicine is taken with certain antidepressants like tranylcypromine or tricyclics, Migraine medications, Nasal decongestants, Nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs)\u00a0 . Rebound hypertension occurs when blood pressure rises after you stop taking or lower the dose of a drug (typically a high blood pressure medication).Many other factors can also affect blood pressure, including:Condition of the kidneys, nervous system, or blood vessels, Genetics, Foods eaten, weight, and other body-related variables, Levels of various hormones in the body, Volume of water in the body . "}, "Diabetes and eye disease": {"description": "Diabetes also increases\u00a0the chance\u00a0of having glaucoma, cataracts, and other eye problems.", "Possible Complications": "Diabetic eye disease can lead to reduced vision and blindness.", "Symptoms": ["Blurred vision and slow vision loss over time", "Floaters", "Shadows or missing areas of vision", "Trouble seeing at night"], "Exams and Tests": "Your eye doctor (ophthalmologist) will examine your eyes. You may first be asked to read an eye chart. Then you will receive eye drops to widen the pupils of your eyes. Tests you may have involve:Measuring the fluid pressure inside your eyes (tonometry), Checking the structures inside your eyes (slit lamp exam), Checking and photographing your retinas (fluorescein angiography). If you have the early stage of diabetic retinopathy (nonproliferative), the eye doctor may see:Blood vessels in the eye that are larger in certain spots (called microaneurysms), Blood vessels that are blocked, Small amounts of bleeding (retinal hemorrhages) and fluid leaking into the retina. If you have advanced retinopathy (proliferative),\u00a0the eye doctor\u00a0may see:New blood vessels starting to grow in the eye that are\u00a0weak and can bleed, Small scars forming on the retina and in other parts of the eye (the vitreous). This exam is different from going to the eye doctor (optometrist) to have your vision checked and to see whether you need new glasses. If you notice a change in vision and see an optometrist, make sure you tell the optometrist that you have diabetes.", "Treatment": "Persons with early diabetic retinopathy may not need treatment. But they should be closely followed by an eye doctor who is trained to treat diabetic eye diseases.Once your eye doctor notices new blood vessels growing in your retina (neovascularization) or you develop macular edema, treatment is usually needed.Eye surgery is\u00a0the main treatment for diabetic retinopathy.Laser eye surgery creates small burns in the retina where there are abnormal blood vessels. This process is called photocoagulation. It is used to keep vessels from leaking, or to shrink abnormal vessels., Surgery\u00a0called vitrectomy is used when there is bleeding (hemorrhage) into the eye. It may also be used to repair retinal detachment.. Medicines that are injected into the eyeball may help prevent abnormal blood vessels from growing. Follow your eye doctor's advice on how to protect your vision. Have eye exams as often as recommended, usually once every 1 to 2 years.If you have diabetes and your blood sugar has been very high, your doctor will give you new medicines to lower your blood sugar level. If you have diabetic neuropathy, your vision can get worse for a short time when you begin taking medicine that improves your blood sugar level.", "Prevention": "Tight control of blood sugar, blood pressure, and cholesterol is very important for preventing diabetic retinopathy.Do not smoke. If you need help quitting, ask your doctor or nurse.", "Causes": "Diabetic retinopathy is caused by damage from diabetes to blood vessels of the retina. The retina is the layer of tissue at the back of the inner eye. It changes light and images\u00a0that enter\u00a0the eye into nerve signals,\u00a0which are sent to the brain.Diabetic retinopathy is\u00a0a main\u00a0cause of blindness in Americans 20 to 74 years old. People with type 1\u00a0or type 2 diabetes\u00a0are at risk\u00a0of this condition.Watch this video about:Diabetes - retinal conditionsThere are two stages of diabetic retinopathy:Nonproliferative develops first, Proliferative is\u00a0more advanced and severe, and is less common. The chance of getting retinopathy and having a more severe form is\u00a0higher when: You have had diabetes for a long time, Your\u00a0blood sugar (glucose)\u00a0has been poorly controlled . Some types of exercise can make diabetic retinopathy worse. If you have retinopathy, check with your doctor before starting an exercise program.Other eye problems that\u00a0can develop in persons with diabetes include:Cataract -- cloudiness of the eye lens, Glaucoma -- increased pressure in the eye that can lead to blindness, Macular edema -- blurry vision due to fluid leaking into the area of the retina that provides sharp central vision, Retinal detachment -- scarring that may cause part of the retina to pull away from the back of your eyeball . High blood sugar or changes in blood sugar level often cause blurred vision. This is because the lens in the middle of the eye cannot change shape when there is too much sugar and water in the lens. This is not the same problem as diabetic retinopathy."}, "Disorder of written expression": {"description": "Disorder of written expression is a childhood condition that involves poor writing skills.", "Possible Complications": "Learning problems, Low self-esteem, Problems with socializing. ", "Symptoms": ["Errors in grammar and punctuation", "Poor handwriting", "Poor spelling", "Poorly organized writing"], "Exams and Tests": "Other causes of learning disabilities must be ruled out before the diagnosis can be confirmed.", "Treatment": "Remedial education is the best approach to this type of disorder.", "Prevention": "Learning disorders often run in families. Affected or potentially affected families should make every effort to recognize problems early. Intervention can begin as early as preschool or kindergarten.", "Causes": "No\u00a0studies have been done to determine how common this disorder is. However, some think it is\u00a0as common as learning and reading disorders.This disorder appears by itself or along with other learning disabilities, such as:Developmental coordination disorder, Expressive language disorder, Mathematics disorder, Reading disorder. "}, "Diarrhea - what to ask your doctor - adult ": {"description": "Below are questions you may want to ask your doctor or nurse to help you take care of your diarrhea."}, "Diabetes - resources": {"description": "Kidney disease resources:"}, "Diet - clear liquid": {"description": "Eating only a clear liquid diet gives you enough nutrition for 3 to 4 days. It is safe for people with diabetes, but only for a short time when they are followed closely by their doctor."}, "Deep venous thrombosis": {"description": "Deep venous thrombosis is a blood clot that forms in a vein deep inside a part of the body. It mainly affects the large veins in the lower leg and thigh.", "Symptoms": ["Changes in skin color (redness)\r\n  ", "Leg pain\r\n  ", "Leg swelling (edema)\r\n  ", "Skin that feels warm to the touch\r\n  "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will perform a physical exam. The exam may show a red, swollen, or tender leg. The two tests that are often done first to diagnose a DVT are:D-dimer blood test, Doppler ultrasound exam of the legs\u00a0 . Blood tests may be done to check if you have an increased chance of blood clotting, including: Activated protein C resistance (checks for the Factor V Leiden mutation), Antithrombin levels, Antiphospholipid antibodies, Complete blood count (CBC), Genetic testing to look for mutations that make you more likely to develop blood clots, such as the prothrombin G20210A mutation, Lupus anticoagulant, Protein C and protein S levels . ", "Causes": "DVTs are most common in adults over age 60. But, they can occur at any age. When a clot breaks off and moves through the bloodstream, this is called an embolism. An embolism can get stuck in the brain, lungs, heart, or other area, leading to severe damage. Blood clots may form when something slows or changes the flow of blood in the veins. Risk factors include: A pacemaker catheter that has been passed through the vein in the groin, Bed rest or sitting in one position for too long such as plane travel, Family history of blood clots, Fractures in the pelvis or legs, Giving birth within the last 6 months, Pregnancy, Obesity, Recent surgery (most commonly hip, knee, or female pelvic surgery), Too many blood cells being made by the bone marrow, causing the blood to be thicker than normal . Blood is more likely to clot in someone who has certain problems or disorders, such as:Cancer, Certain autoimmune disorders, such as lupus, Cigarette smoking, Conditions that make it more likely to develop blood clots, Taking estrogens or birth control pills (this risk is even higher with smoking) . Sitting for long periods when traveling can increase the risk of DVTs. This is most likely when you also have one or more of the risk factors listed above.", "Prevention": "To prevent deep vein thrombosis: Wear the pressure stockings your doctor prescribed. , Moving your legs often during long plane trips, car trips, and other situations in which you are sitting or lying down for long periods. , Take blood thinning medicines your doctor prescribes. , Do not smoke. Talk to your doctor if you need help quitting. . ", "Treatment": "Your doctor will give you medicine to thin your blood (called an anticoagulant). This will keep more clots from forming or old ones from getting bigger.Heparin is usually the first drug you will receive. If heparin is given through a vein (IV), you must stay in the hospital., Newer forms of heparin can be given by injection under your skin once or twice a day. You may not need to stay in the hospital as long, or at all, if you are prescribed this newer form of heparin. . Depending on your medical history, fondaparinux may be recommended by your doctor as an alternative to heparin. A blood-thinning drug, for example warfarin (Coumadin), is usually started along with heparin. Warfarin is taken by mouth. It takes several days to fully work., Heparin is not stopped until the warfarin has been at the right dose for at least 2 days., You will most likely take warfarin for at least 3 months. Some people must take it longer, or even for the rest of their lives, depending on their risk for another clot. . When you are taking warfarin, you are more likely to bleed, even from activities you have always done. If you are taking warfarin at home: Take the medicine just the way your doctor prescribed it., Ask the doctor what to do if you miss a dose., Get blood tests as advised by your doctor to make sure you are taking the right dose., Learn how to take other medicines and when to eat., Find out how to watch for problems caused by the drug.. You will be given a pressure stocking to wear on your leg or legs. A pressure stocking improves blood flow in your legs and reduces your risk for complications from blood clots. It is important to wear it every day. In rare cases, you may need surgery if medicines do not work. Surgery may involve: Placing a filter in the body's largest vein to prevent blood clots from traveling to the lungs, Removing a large blood clot from the vein or injecting clot-busting medicines . "}, "Digestive diseases": {"description": "The digestive tract is made up of the esophagus (food tube), stomach, large and small intestines, liver, pancreas, and the gallbladder."}, "Developmental milestones record - 2 years": {"description": "Play recommendations:"}, "Diarrhea in children - diet": {"description": "Diarrhea in children and babies is the passage of loose stools."}, "Dental crowns": {"description": "A crown is a tooth-shaped cap that replaces your normal tooth above the gum line. You may need a crown to support a weak tooth or to make your tooth look better."}, "Dementia - home care": {"description": "See also:"}, "Duodenal atresia": {"description": "Duodenal atresia is a condition in which the first part of the small bowel (the duodenum) has not developed properly. It is not open and cannot allow the passage of stomach contents.", "Possible Complications": "Other birth defects, Dehydration. After surgery, there may be late complications such as:Swelling of the first part of the small bowel (megaduodenum), Problems with movement through the intestines, Gastroesophageal reflux. ", "Symptoms": ["Upper abdominal swelling may or may not be present\r\n", "Early vomiting of large amounts, which may be greenish (containing bile)\r\n", "Continued vomiting even when infant has not been fed for several hours\r\n", "Absent urination after first few voidings\r\n", "Absent bowel movements after first few meconium stools"], "Exams and Tests": "A fetal ultrasound may show excessive amounts of amniotic fluid in the womb, a condition called polyhydramnios. It may also show swelling of the baby's stomach and part of the duodenum.An abdominal x-ray may show air in the stomach and first part of duodenum, with no air beyond that. This is known as the double-bubble sign.", "Treatment": "A tube is placed to decompress the stomach. Dehydration and electrolyte abnormalities are corrected by providing fluids through an intravenous tube. An evaluation for other congenital anomalies should be performed.Surgery to correct the duodenal blockage is necessary, but is not an emergency. The surgical approach will depend on the nature of the abnormality. Associated problems (such as those related to Down syndrome) must be treated as appropriate.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention.", "Causes": "The cause of duodenal atresia is unknown, but it is thought to result from problems during an embryo's development in which the duodenum does not normally change from a solid to a tube-like structure.Duodenal atresia is seen in more than 1 in 10,000 live births. Approximately 20-30% of infants with duodenal atresia have Down syndrome. Duodenal atresia is often associated with other birth defects."}, "Developmental milestones record - 3 years": {"description": "This article describes the skills and growth markers that are relevant to 3-year-olds."}, "Dexamethasone suppression test": {"description": "Dexamethasone suppression test measures whether adrenocorticotrophic hormone (ACTH) secretion by the pituitary can be suppressed."}, "Diabetes and kidney disease": {"Symptoms": ["Fatigue most of the time", "General ill feeling", "Headache", "Nausea and vomiting", "Poor appetite", "Swelling of the legs", "Itchy skin\u00a0\r\n "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will order tests to detect signs of kidney problems.\u00a0A urine test looks for a protein called albumin leaking into the urine. Too much albumin in the urine\u00a0is often a sign of kidney damage., This test is also called a\u00a0microalbuminuria\u00a0test because it measures small amounts of albumin. . Your health care provider will also check your blood pressure. This is because if you have diabetic nephropathy, you likely also have high blood pressure.A kidney biopsy\u00a0may be\u00a0ordered to confirm the diagnosis or look for other causes of kidney damage.\u00a0If you have diabetes, your health care provider will also check your kidneys\u00a0by using the following blood tests every year:BUN, Serum creatinine. ", "description": "Kidney disease or kidney damage that occurs in people with diabetes\u00a0is called diabetic nephropathy. This condition is a complication of diabetes.", "Causes": "Each kidney is made of hundreds of thousands of small units called nephrons. These structures filter your blood, help remove waste from\u00a0the body, and control fluid balance.In people with diabetes, the nephrons slowly thicken and become scarred over time. The kidneys begin to leak and protein (albumin) passes into the urine. This damage can happen years before any symptoms begin.\u00a0Kidney damage is more likely if you:Have uncontrolled blood sugar, Have high blood pressure, Have type 1 diabetes that began before you were 20 years old, Have family members who also have diabetes and\u00a0kidney problems, Smoke, Are African American, Mexican American, or Native American . ", "Treatment": "When kidney damage is caught in its early stages, it can be slowed with treatment. Once larger amounts of protein appear in the urine, kidney damage will slowly get worse.Follow your health care provider's advice to keep your condition from getting worse.CONTROL YOUR BLOOD PRESSUREKeeping your blood pressure under control (below 130/80) is one of the best ways to slow kidney damage.Your doctor may prescribe medicines to lower your blood pressure and protect your kidneys from more damage., Taking\u00a0these medicines, even when your\u00a0 blood pressure is in a healthy range, helps slow kidney damage. . CONTROL YOUR BLOOD SUGAR LEVELYou can also slow kidney damage by controlling your blood sugar level, which\u00a0you can do\u00a0by:Eating healthy foods, Getting regular exercise, Taking medicine or insulin\u00a0as instructed by\u00a0your health care provider, Checking your blood sugar level as often as instructed\u00a0and keeping a record of your blood sugar numbers so that you know how meals and activities affect your level. OTHER WAYS TO PROTECT YOUR KIDNEYS Before having an MRI, CT scan, or other imaging test in which you receive a contrast dye, tell the health care provider who is ordering the test that you have diabetes.\u00a0Contrast dye can cause more damage to your kidneys., Before taking\u00a0an NSAID pain medicine, such as ibuprofen\u00a0or naproxen, ask your health care provider if there is another kind of medicine that you can take instead. NSAIDs can damage the kidneys, especially when you use them often., Know the signs of urinary tract infections and get them treated right away. . "}, "Dental x-rays": {"description": "Structures that are dense (such as silver fillings or metal restoration) will block most of the light energy from the x-ray. They will appear white on developed film. Structures containing air will be black on film, and teeth, tissue, and fluid will appear as shades of gray."}, "Diet and cancer": {"description": "Up to a third of deaths may be linked to lifestyle factors such as diet, physical activity, and obesity. Another third of deaths are due to tobacco products. Diet, as well as tobacco use, infections, and chemicals or hormones are major risk factors that can be changed. There is strong evidence that eating a healthy diet, being physically active, and achieving and maintaining a healthy body weight can help lower cancer risk."}, "Deciding about hormone therapy": {"description": "Hormone therapy (HT) uses one or more hormones to treat symptoms of menopause."}, "Dieffenbachia poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Burning in mouth or throat", "Damage to cornea of the eye", "Diarrhea", "Eye pain", "Hoarse voice", "Nausea or vomiting", "Swelling and blistering in the mouth or tongue"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Do not touch or eat any plant with which you are not familiar. Wash your hands after working in the garden or walking in the woods."}, "Dilantin overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Coma", "Confusion", "Fever", "Involuntary, jerky, repeated movement of the eyeballs (nystagmus)", "Lethargy", "Low blood pressure", "Nausea", "Sleepiness", "Slow or slurred speech", "Staggering gait or walk", "Swollen gums", "Tremor", "Unsteadiness", "Uncoordinated movements", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Diabetes - eye care": {"description": "Diabetic retinopathy - care"}, "Duodenum": {"description": "Absorption of vitamins, minerals, and other nutrients begins in the duodenum."}, "Drug allergies": {"description": "Drug allergies are a group of symptoms caused by an allergic reaction to a drug (medication).", "Possible Complications": "Life-threatening, severe allergic reaction (anaphylaxis), Asthma, Severe swelling\u00a0under the skin (angioedema), which can be life threatening if it affects the throat, tongue, or lungs, Death. ", "Symptoms": ["Hives", "Itching of the skin or eyes (common)", "Skin rash (common)", "Swelling of the lips, tongue, or face", "Wheezing", "Abdominal pain or cramping", "Confusion", "Diarrhea", "Difficulty breathing with wheeze or hoarse voice", "Dizziness", "Fainting, light-headedness", "Hives over different parts of the body", "Nausea, vomiting", "Rapid pulse", "Sensation of feeling the heart beat (palpitations) "], "Exams and Tests": "An examination may show: Decreased blood pressure, Hives, Rash, Swelling of the lips, face, or tongue (angioedema) , Wheezing. Skin testing may help diagnose an\u00a0allergy to penicillin-type medications. There are no good skin or blood tests to help diagnose other drug allergies. If you have had allergy-like symptoms after taking a medicine or receiving contrast (dye) before getting an x-ray, your\u00a0health care provider\u00a0will often tell you that this is proof of a drug allergy. You do not need more testing.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to relieve symptoms and prevent a severe reaction.Treatment may include:\r\n  Antihistamines to relieve mild symptoms such as rash, hives, and itching\r\n  , \r\n  \r\n  Bronchodilators such as albuterol to reduce asthma-like symptoms (moderate wheezing or cough)\r\n  \r\n  , \r\n  Corticosteroids applied to the skin, given by mouth, or given through a vein (intravenously)\r\n  , Epinephrine by injection to treat anaphylaxis . The offending medication and similar drugs should be avoided. Make sure all your health care providers -- including dentists and hospital staff -- know about any drug allergies that you or your children have.In some cases, a penicillin (or other drug) allergy responds to desensitization. This treatment involves being given larger and larger doses of a medicine to improve your tolerance of the drug. The desensitization should be done only by an allergist, when there is no alternative drug for you to take. ", "Prevention": "There is generally no way to prevent a drug allergy.If you have a known drug allergy, avoiding the medication is the best way to prevent an allergic reaction. You may also be told to avoid similar medicines.In some cases, a health care provider may approve the use of a drug that causes an allergy if you are first treated with corticosteroids (such as prednisone) and antihistamines (such as diphenhydramine). Do not try this without a health care provider's supervision. Pretreatment with corticosteroids and antihistamines has been shown to prevent anaphylaxis in people who need to get x-ray contrast dye.Your health care provider may also recommend densensitization.", "Causes": "Adverse reactions to drugs are common. (adverse means unwanted or unexpected.) Almost any drug can cause an adverse reaction. Reactions range from irritating or mild side effects such as nausea and vomiting to life-threatening anaphylaxis.A true drug allergy is caused by a series of chemical steps in the body that produce the allergic reaction to a medication.The first time you take the medicine, you may have no problems. However, your body's immune system may produce a substance (antibody) called IgE against that drug. The next time you take the drug, the IgE tells your white blood cells to make a chemical called histamine, which causes your allergy symptoms. A drug allergy may also occur without your body producing IgE. Instead, it might produce other types of antibodies, or have other reactions that do not produce antibodies.Most drug allergies cause minor skin rashes and hives. Serum sickness is a delayed type of drug allergy that occurs a week or more after you are exposed to a medication or vaccine.Common allergy-causing drugs include:\r\n Anticonvulsants\r\n , \r\n Insulin (especially animal sources of insulin)\r\n , \r\n Iodinated (containing iodine) x-ray contrast dyes (these can cause allergy-like reactions)\r\n , \r\n Penicillin and related antibiotics\r\n , \r\n Sulfa drugs\r\n . Most side effects of drugs are not due to an allergic reaction. For example, aspirin can cause nonallergic hives or trigger asthma. Some drug reactions are considered idiosyncratic. This means the reaction is an unusual effect of the medication. It is not due to a known chemical effect of the drug. Many people confuse an uncomfortable, but not serious, side effect of a medicine (such as nausea) with a true drug allergy."}, "Dialysis - hemodialysis": {"description": "There are different types of kidney dialysis. This article focuses on hemodialysis."}, "Diclofenac sodium overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Diarrhea", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness", "Headache (can be severe)", "Movement problems", "Nausea and vomiting (sometimes with blood)", "Numbness and tingling", "Ringing in the ears", "Stomach pain (with possible bleeding in the stomach and intestines)", "Rash", "Seizures", "Unsteadiness", "Urination problems (little to no urine output)", "Wheezing"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222. "}, "Developmental milestones record - 9 months": {"description": "At 9 months, a typical infant will have certain skills and reach growth markers called milestones."}, "Dilated cardiomyopathy": {"Symptoms": ["Chest pain or pressure (more likely with exercise)", "Cough", "Fatigue, weakness, faintness", "Irregular or rapid pulse", "Loss of appetite ", "Shortness of breath with activity or after lying down (or being asleep) for a while", "Swelling of feet and ankles"], "Exams and Tests": "During the exam, the health care provider may find:The heart is enlarged , Lung crackles (a sign of fluid buildup), heart murmur, or other abnormal sounds , The liver is possibly enlarged, Neck veins may be bulging. A number of laboratory tests may be done to determine the cause:Antinuclear antibody (ANA), erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), and other tests to diagnose autoimmune illnesses, Antibody test to identify infections such as Lyme disease and HIV, Iron tests of the blood, Serum TSH and T4 test to identify thyroid problems, Tests for amyloidosis. Heart enlargement or other problems with the structure and function of the heart (such as weak squeezing) may show up on these tests:Echocardiogram (ultrasound of the heart), Cardiac stress tests, Chest x-ray, Coronary angiogram to look at blood flow to the heart , CT scan of the heart, MRI of the heart, Nuclear heart scan (MUGA, RNV). Heart biopsy, in which a small piece of heart muscle is removed, may be needed depending on the cause. However, this is rarely done.", "description": "Some experts use the term \"dilated cardiomyopathy\" for cases where the primary problem is with the muscle itself. This definition does not include weakness or enlargement that was caused by a heart attack or a heart valve problem. ", "Causes": "The most common causes of dilated cardiomyopathy are:Heart disease caused by a narrowing of the arteries, Poorly controlled high blood pressure . There are many other causes of dilated cardiomyopathy, including:Alcohol or cocaine abuse, Medicines that can be toxic to the heart, such as drugs used to treat cancer, Abnormal heart rhythms in which the heart beats very fast for a long period of time , Autoimmune illnesses, Conditions that run in families, Infections that involve the heart muscle, Heart valves that are either too narrow or too leaky , Exposure to heavy metals such as lead, arsenic, or mercury. This condition can affect anyone at any age. However, it is most common in adult men.", "Treatment": "Things you can do at home to take care of your condition include:Know your body, and watch for symptoms that your heart failure is getting worse., Watch for changes in your symptoms, heart rate, pulse, blood pressure, and weight., Limit how much you drink and how much salt (sodium) you get in your diet.. Most people who have heart failure need to take medicines. Some medicines treat your symptoms. Others may help prevent your heart failure from becoming worse, or may prevent other heart problems.Procedures and surgeries you may need include:A pacemaker to help treat slow heart rates or help your heartbeat stay in sync, A defibrillator that recognizes life-threatening heart rhythms and sends an electrical pulse to stop them, Heart bypass (CABG) surgery or angioplasty to improve blood flow to the damaged or weakened heart muscle, Valve replacement or repair. For advanced cardiomyopathy:A heart transplant may be recommended if standard treatments have not\u00a0worked and heart failure symptoms are very severe., Placement of a left ventricular assist device or artificial heart may be considered.. Chronic heart failure becomes worse over time. Many people who have heart failure will die from the condition. Thinking about the type of care you may want at the end of life and discussing these issues with loved ones and your health care provider is important."}, "Diabetes": {"description": "Diabetes is a chronic disease in which the body cannot regulate the amount of sugar in the blood.", "Symptoms": ["Blurry vision", "Excess thirst", "Fatigue", "Frequent urination", "Hunger", "Weight loss ", "Eye problems, including trouble seeing (especially at night), light sensitivity, and blindness", "Sores and infections of the leg or foot, which untreated can\u00a0lead to\u00a0amputation of the leg or foot", "Damage to nerves in the body, causing pain, tingling, a loss of feeling, problems digesting food, and erectile dysfunction", "Kidney problems, which can lead to kidney failure", "Weakened immune system, which can lead to more frequent infections", "Increased chance of having a heart attack\u00a0or stroke"], "Exams and Tests": "A urine analysis may show high blood sugar. But a urine test alone does not diagnose diabetes.Your health care provider may suspect that you have diabetes if your blood sugar level is higher than 200 mg/dL. To confirm the diagnosis, one or more of the following tests must be done.Blood tests:Fasting blood glucose level -- diabetes is diagnosed if\u00a0the fasting glucose level\u00a0is higher than 126 mg/dL on two different tests. Levels between 100 and 126 mg/dL are called impaired fasting glucose or pre-diabetes. These levels are risk factors for type 2 diabetes., Hemoglobin A1c\u00a0(A1C) test -- \r\nNormal: Less than 5.7%, Pre-diabetes: 5.7% - 6.4%, Diabetes: 6.5% or higher . , Oral glucose tolerance test -- diabetes is diagnosed if the glucose level is higher than 200 mg/dL 2 hours\u00a0after drinking a\u00a0sugar drink. (This test is used more often for type 2 diabetes.) . Screening for type 2 diabetes in people who have no symptoms is recommended for:Overweight children who have other risk factors for diabetes, starting at age 10 and repeated every\u00a03 years, Overweight adults (BMI of 25 or higher) who have other risk factors, Adults over age 45, repeated every 3 years. ", "Causes": "Insulin is a hormone produced by the pancreas to control blood sugar. Diabetes can be caused by too little insulin, resistance to insulin, or both.To understand diabetes, it is important to first understand the normal process by which food is broken down and used by the body for energy. Several things happen when food is digested:A sugar called glucose enters the bloodstream. Glucose is a source of fuel for the body., An organ called the pancreas makes insulin. The role of insulin is to move glucose from the bloodstream into muscle, fat, and liver cells, where it can be stored or used as fuel. . People with diabetes have high blood sugar because their body cannot move sugar from the blood\u00a0into muscle and fat cells to be burned or stored for energy, and because their liver makes\u00a0too much glucose and releases it into the blood. This is because either:Their pancreas does not make enough insulin, Their cells do not respond to insulin normally, Both of the above . There are two major types of diabetes. The causes and risk factors are different for each type:Type 1 diabetes can occur at any age, but it is most often diagnosed in children, teens, or young adults. In this disease, the body makes little or no insulin. This is because the pancreas cells that make insulin stop working. Daily injections of insulin are needed. The exact cause is unknown., Type 2 diabetes is much more common. It most often occurs in adulthood, but because of high obesity rates, teens and young adults are now being diagnosed with this disease.\u00a0Some people with type 2 diabetes do not know they have it., There are other causes of diabetes, and some patients cannot be classified as type 1 or type 2. . Gestational diabetes is high blood sugar that develops at any time during pregnancy in a woman who does not have diabetes.If your parent, brother, or sister has diabetes, you may be more likely to develop the disease.", "Prevention": "Keeping an ideal body weight and an active lifestyle may prevent or delay the start of type 2 diabetes.Type 1 diabetes cannot be prevented.", "Treatment": "Type 2 diabetes may be reversed with lifestyle changes, especially losing weight\u00a0with exercise\u00a0and by\u00a0eating healthier foods. Some cases of type 2 diabetes can also\u00a0be improved with weight-loss surgery.There is no cure for type 1 diabetes. Treating\u00a0either type 1 diabetes\u00a0or type 2 diabetes involves medicines, diet, and exercise to control blood sugar level.Everyone with diabetes should receive proper education and support about the best ways to manage their diabetes. Ask your healthcare provider about seeing a diabetes educator. \r\n Getting better control over your blood sugar, cholesterol, and blood pressure levels helps reduce the risk of kidney disease, eye disease, nervous system disease, heart attack, and stroke.To prevent diabetes complications, visit your health care provider at least two to four times a year. Talk about any problems you are having. Follow your health care provider's instructions on managing your diabetes. "}, "Diabetes - tests and checkups ": {"description": "Routine diabetes tests"}, "Dermatomyositis": {"description": "Dermatomyositis is a muscle disease that involves inflammation and a skin rash. It is a type of inflammatory myopathy.", "Possible Complications": "Acute renal failure, Cancer (malignancy), Inflammation of the heart, Joint pain, Lung disease. ", "Symptoms": ["Problems swallowing \r\n ", "Muscle weakness, stiffness, or soreness", "Purple color to the upper eyelids", "Purple-red skin rash", "Shortness of breath"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will do a physical exam. Tests may include:Bloods test to check levels of creatine phosphokinase and aldolase\u00a0, Blood tests for autoimmune diseases, ECG, Electromyography, Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), Muscle biopsy, Skin biopsy. ", "Treatment": "The disease is treated with anti-inflammatory medicines called corticosteroids and other drugs that suppress the immune system.When your muscles get stronger, your doctor may tell you to slowly cut back on your doses. Most people with this condition must take a medicine called prednisone for the rest of their lives.If a tumor is causing the condition, the muscle weakness and rash may get better when the tumor is removed.", "Causes": "The cause of dermatomyositis is unknown. Experts think it may be due to a viral infection of the muscles or a problem with the body's immune system. It may also occur in patients who have cancer in the abdomen, lung, or other parts of the body.Anyone can develop dermatomyositis. It most commonly occurs in children age 5 - 15 and adults age 40 - 60. Women develop this condition more often than men.Polymyositis is a similar condition, but the symptoms do not include a skin rash."}, "Diabetes type 2 - meal planning": {"description": "When you have type 2 diabetes, taking time to plan your meals goes a long way toward controlling your blood sugar and weight."}, "Diabetes - foot ulcers": {"description": "Diabetic foot ulcer; Ulcer - foot"}, "Day to day with COPD": {"description": "Your doctor gave you the news: you have COPD. There is no cure, but there are things you can do every day to keep COPD from getting worse, to protect your lungs, and to stay healthy."}, "Deciding about an IUD": {"description": "An intrauterine device (IUD) is a small, plastic, T-shaped device used for birth control. It is inserted into the uterus where it stays to prevent pregnancy. "}, "Drooling": {"description": "Drooling is saliva flowing outside the mouth.", "Causes": "Some drooling in infants and toddlers is normal. It may occur with teething. Drooling in infants and young children may get worse with colds and allergies.Drooling may happen if your body makes too much saliva. Infections can cause this, including:Mononucleosis, Peritonsillar abscess, Strep throat, Sinus infections, Tonsillitis. Other conditions that can cause too much saliva are:Allergies, Heartburn or GERD (reflux), Poisoning (especially by pesticides), Pregnancy (may be due to pregnancy side effects, such as nausea or reflux), Reaction to snake or insect venom, Swollen adenoids, Use of certain medications . Drooling may also be caused by nervous system disorders that make it hard to swallow. Examples are:Amyotrophic lateral sclerosis, or ALS, Autism, Cerebral palsy (CP), Down syndrome, Multiple sclerosis, Parkinson disease, Stroke . "}, "Dengue hemorrhagic fever": {"description": "Dengue hemorrhagic fever is a severe, potentially deadly infection spread by some mosquitos.", "Possible Complications": "Dengue hemorrhagic fever may cause these complications:Brain disease, Liver damage, Residual brain damage, Seizures, Shock . ", "Symptoms": ["Decreased appetite", "Fever", "Headache", "Joint or muscle aches", "General ill feeling", "Vomiting ", "Patches of blood under the skin", "Tiny spots of blood on the skin", "Generalized rash", "Worsening early symptoms ", "Cold, clammy arms and legs", "Sweating "], "Exams and Tests": "A physical examination may reveal:Enlarged liver, Low blood pressure, Rash, Red eyes, Red throat, Swollen glands, Weak, rapid pulse. Tests may include:Arterial blood gases, Blood tests (to find signs of the virus in the blood), Coagulation studies, Electrolytes, Hematocrit, Liver enzymes, Platelet count, Serum studies from samples taken during acute illness and afterwards, Tourniquet test (causes blood patches to form below the tourniquet), X-ray of the chest (may show buildup of fluid in the lungs and chest) . ", "Treatment": "Because dengue hemorrhagic fever is caused by a virus for which there is no known cure or vaccine, the only treatment is to treat the symptoms. These treatments may include:A transfusion of fresh blood or platelets\u00a0to correct bleeding problems, Intravenous (IV) fluids and electrolytes to correct electrolyte imbalances, Oxygen therapy to treat abnormally low blood oxygen, Rehydration with intravenous (IV) fluids to treat dehydration, Supportive care in an intensive care unit or similar setting . ", "Prevention": "Because there is no way to prevent dengue fever, use personal protection such as:Full-coverage clothing, Mosquito nets, Mosquito repellent containing DEET . If possible, travel during times of the day when mosquitoes are less active. Mosquito control programs can also reduce the risk of infection.", "Causes": "Four different dengue viruses are known to cause dengue hemorrhagic fever. Dengue hemorrhagic fever occurs when a person is bitten by a mosquito that is infected with the virus. The mosquito Aedes aegypti is the main species that spreads this disease.There are more than 100 million new cases of dengue fever every year throughout the world. A small number of these develop into dengue hemorrhagic fever. Most infections in the United States are brought in from other countries. Risk factors for dengue hemorrhagic fever include having antibodies to dengue virus from an earlier infection. "}, "Day care health risks": {"description": "You can help by creating an action plan with your health care provider and making sure your child's day care staff knows how to follow that plan."}, "Dubin-Johnson syndrome": {"description": "Dubin-Johnson syndrome is a disorder passed down through families (inherited) in which a person has mild jaundice throughout life.", "Possible Complications": "Complications are unusual, but may include the following:Reduced liver function, Severe jaundice. ", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "The following tests can help diagnose this syndrome:Liver biopsy, Liver enzyme levels (blood test), Serum bilirubin, Urinary coproporphyrin levels. ", "Treatment": "No specific treatment is required.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling may be helpful for people who wish to have children and have a family history of Dubin-Johnson syndrome.", "Causes": "Dubin-Johnson syndrome is a very rare genetic disorder. In order to inherit the condition, a child must get a copy of the defective gene from both parents.The syndrome interferes with the body's ability to move a chemical called bilirubin from the liver. Bilirubin is produced when the liver breaks down worn out red blood cells. It normally moves through the bile produced by the liver and into the bile ducts, past the gallbladder, and into the digestive system.When bilirubin is not properly processed, it builds up in the bloodstream and causes the skin and the whites of the eyes to turn yellow (jaundice). Severely high levels of bilirubin can damage the brain and other organs.People with Dubin-Johnson syndrome have lifelong mild jaundice that may be made worse by:Alcohol, Birth control pills, Environmental factors that affect the liver, Infection, Pregnancy . "}, "DASH diet to lower high blood pressure": {"description": "DASH stands for Dietary Approaches to Stop Hypertension. The DASH diet can help lower high blood pressure and cholesterol and other fats in your blood. It can help lower your risk for heart attack and stroke and help you lose weight. This diet is low in sodium (salt) and rich in nutrients."}, "Drawing medicine out of a vial": {"description": "Administering injections; Giving a needle; Giving insulin"}, "Developmental milestones record - 6 months": {"description": "This article describes the skills and growth targets for 6-month-old infants."}, "Deciding to quit drinking alcohol": {"description": "Alcohol use disorder - quitting drinking; Alcohol abuse - quitting drinking; Quitting drinking; Quitting alcohol"}, "Dysarthria": {"Symptoms": ["Sounding as though they are mumbling", "Speaking softly or in a whisper", "Speaking in a nasal or stuffy, hoarse, strained, or breathy voice"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will take a medical history and perform a physical examination. Family and friends may need to help with the medical history.A procedure called laryngoscopy\u00a0may be done. During this procedure, a flexible viewing tube called a laryngoscope is placed in the mouth and throat to view the voice box.Tests that may be\u00a0done if the cause of the dysarthria is unknown include:Blood tests for toxins or vitamin levels, Imaging tests, such as an MRI or CT scan of the brain or neck, Nerve conduction studies and electromyogram to check the electrical function of the nerves or muscles, Swallowing study, which may include x-rays and drinking a special liquid . ", "description": "Dysarthria is a condition in which you have difficulty saying words because of problems with the muscles that help you talk.", "Causes": "In a person with dysarthria, a nerve, brain, or muscle disorder makes it difficult to use or control the muscles of the mouth, tongue, larynx, or vocal cords.The muscles may be weak or completely paralyzed. Or, it may be\u00a0hard for the muscles to work together.Dysarthria may be the result of brain damage due to:Brain injury, Brain tumor, Dementia, Disease that causes the brain to lose its function (degenerative brain disease), Multiple sclerosis, Parkinson disease, Stroke. Dysarthria may result from damage to the nerves that supply the muscles that help you talk, or to the muscles themselves from:Face or neck trauma, Surgery for head and neck cancer, such as partial or total removal of the tongue or voice box. Dysarthria may be caused by diseases that affect nerves and muscles (neuromuscular diseases):Cerebral palsy, Muscular dystrophy, Myasthenia gravis. Other causes may include:Alcohol intoxication, Poorly fitting dentures, Side effects of medications that act on the central nervous system, such as narcotics, phenytoin, or carbamazepine . ", "Treatment": "You may need to be referred to a speech and language therapist for testing and treatment. Special skills you may learn include:Safe chewing or swallowing techniques, if needed, To avoid conversations when you are tired, To repeat sounds over and over again so you can learn mouth movements, To speak slowly, use a louder voice, and pause to make sure other people understand, What to do when you feel frustrated while speaking . You can use many different devices or techniques to help with speech, such as:Computers to type out words, Flip cards with words or symbols, Special computer programs that allow you to create spoken words by typing words or clicking on symbols . Surgery may help people with dysarthria."}, "DHEA-sulfate test": {"description": "The DHEA-sulfate test measures the amount of DHEA-sulfate in the blood. DHEA-sulfate is a weak male hormone (androgen) produced by the adrenal gland in both men and women. DHEA stands for dehydroepiandrosterone."}, "Diet - full liquid": {"description": "Eating only a full liquid diet gives you enough nutrition. You can stay on it for a long time. Your doctor may recommend certain vitamins and supplements. This diet is safe for people with diabetes, but only when they are followed closely by their doctor."}, "Diabetes and exercise ": {"description": "But be patient. It may take several months of exercising before you see changes in your health."}, "Drowsiness": {"description": "Drowsiness refers to feeling abnormally sleepy during the day. People who are drowsy may fall asleep in inappropriate situations or at inappropriate times.", "Causes": " Drowsiness may be due to the following:Chronic pain, Diabetes, Having to work long hours or different shifts (nights, weekends), Changes in blood sodium levels (hyponatremia /hypernatremia), Medicines (tranquilizers, sleeping pills, antihistamines)\r\n, Not sleeping for long enough, Sleep disorders (such as sleep apnea syndrome and narcolepsy), Too much calcium in your blood (hypercalcemia), Underactive thyroid (hypothyroidism). "}, "Diverticulitis and diverticulosis - discharge": {"description": "If your diverticulitis was very bad, or a repeat of past swelling, you may need surgery."}, "Diabetes insipidus - nephrogenic": {"description": "Nephrogenic diabetes insipidus is a disorder in which a defect in the small tubes (tubules) in the kidneys causes a person to pass a large amount of urine and lose too much water. ", "Possible Complications": "Dilation of the ureters and bladder, High blood sodium (hypernatremia), Severe dehydration, Shock. ", "Symptoms": ["Dry mucus membranes", "Dry skin", "Sunken appearance to eyes", "Sunken fontanelles (soft spot) in infants ", "Fatigue, lethargy", "Headache", "Irritability", "Low body temperature", "Muscle pain", "Rapid heart rate", "Weight loss", "A change in alertness, and even coma"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam may reveal:Low blood pressure, Rapid pulse, Shock, Signs of dehydration. Testing may reveal:High serum osmolality, High urine output, regardless of how much fluid you drink, Kidneys do not\u00a0concentrate urine when you are given ADH, Low urine osmolality, Normal or high ADH levels . Other tests that may be done include:Serum sodium, Urine 24-hour volume, Urine concentration test, Urine specific gravity. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to control the body's fluid levels. Patients will be given a large amount of fluids. The amount of fluids given should be about equal to the amount of water being lost in the urine.If the condition is due to a certain medication, stopping the drug may improve symptoms. Never stop taking any medication without first talking to your doctor.Medicines may be given to improve symptoms.", "Prevention": "Congenital NDI cannot be prevented.Treating the disorders that can lead to the acquired form of the condition may prevent it from developing in some cases. ", "Causes": "Normally, the kidney tubules allow most water to be removed and returned to the blood.Nephrogenic diabetes insipidus (NDI) occurs when the kidney tubules do not respond to a\u00a0hormone in the body called antidiuretic hormone (ADH), also called vasopressin. ADH normally tells the kidneys to make the urine more concentrated.As a result of the defect, the kidneys release too much water into the urine. This causes the body to produce a large quantity of very dilute urine. NDI is rare. Congenital diabetes insipidus is present at birth as a result of defect passed down through families. Usually men are affected, though women can pass the gene on to their children.Most commonly, NDI develops because of other reasons. This is called an acquired disorder. Factors that can trigger the acquired form of this condition include:Blockage in the urinary tract, High calcium levels, Low potassium levels, Use of certain drugs (lithium, demeclocycline, amphotericin B). "}, "Diverticulitis - what to ask your doctor ": {"description": "Below are some questions you may want to ask your health care provider about diverticulitis."}, "Deep brain stimulation": {"description": "Deep brain stimulation (DBS) uses a device called a neurostimulator to deliver electrical signals to the areas of the brain that control movement, pain, mood, weight, and awakening. "}, "Diet - chronic kidney disease": {"description": "You may need to alter your diet more if your kidney disease gets worse, or if you need dialysis."}, "Depilatory poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Blurred vision", "Breathing difficulty", "Burning pain in the throat", "Burns to the eye (if depilatory cream gets in your eye)", "Collapse", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness)", "Diarrhea (watery, bloody)", "Drooling", "Inability to walk in a normal manner", "Low blood pressure", "No urine output", "Rash", "Slurred speech", "Stupor", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Diabetes - what to ask your doctor - type 2": {"description": "Below are some questions you may want to ask your doctor or nurse to help you take care of your diabetes."}, "Dye remover poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty (from breathing in dye remover)", "Throat swelling (may also cause breathing difficulty)", "Severe change in acid level of blood (pH balance), which leads to damage in all of the body organs", "Loss of vision", "Severe pain in the throat", "Severe pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue", "Blood in the stool", "Burns and possible holes (perforations) in the esophagus", "Severe abdominal pain", "Vomiting", "Vomiting blood", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure that develops rapidly", "Burns", "Holes (necrosis) in the skin or tissues underneath", "Irritation"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Disseminated intravascular coagulation (DIC)": {"description": "Disseminated intravascular coagulation (DIC) is a serious disorder in which the proteins that control blood clotting become\u00a0over active.", "Possible Complications": "Bleeding, Lack of blood flow to the arms, legs, or vital organs, Stroke. ", "Symptoms": ["Bleeding, possibly from many sites in the body", "Blood clots", "Bruising", "Drop in blood pressure "], "Exams and Tests": "You may have any of the following tests:Complete blood count with blood smear exam, Fibrin degradation products, Partial thromboplastin time (PTT), Prothrombin time (PT), Serum fibrinogen. ", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for DIC. The goal is to determine and treat the underlying cause of DIC.Supportive treatments may include:Plasma transfusions to replace blood clotting factors if a large amount of bleeding is occurring, Blood thinner medicine (heparin) to prevent blood clotting if a large amount of clotting is occurring. ", "Prevention": "\r\n \r\nGet prompt treatment for conditions known to bring on this disorder. \r\n", "Causes": "When you are injured, proteins in the blood that form blood clots travel to the injury site to help stop bleeding. If you have DIC, these proteins become abnormally active throughout the body. This may be due to inflammation, infection, or cancer.Small blood clots form in the blood vessels. Some of these clots can clog the vessels and cut off blood supply to organs such as the liver, brain, or kidneys. Lack of blood flow can damage the organ and it may stop working properly.Over time, the clotting proteins in your blood are consumed or \"used up.\" When this happens, you have a high risk of serious bleeding, even from a minor injury or without injury. You may also have bleeding that starts spontaneously (on its own). The disease can also cause healthy red blood cells to break up when they travel through the small vessels that are filled with clots. Risk factors for DIC include:Blood transfusion reaction, Cancer, especially certain types of leukemia, Inflammation of the pancreas (pancreatitis), Infection in the blood, especially by bacteria or fungus, Liver disease, Pregnancy complications (such as placenta that is left behind after delivery), Recent surgery or anesthesia, Severe tissue injury (as in burns and head injury), Large hemangioma (a blood vessel that is not formed properly). "}, "Diabetes diet - gestational": {"description": "Gestational diabetes is high blood sugar (glucose) that starts during pregnancy. Eating a balanced, healthy diet can help you manage gestational diabetes. The diet recommendations that follow are for women with gestational diabetes who do NOT take insulin."}, "Drainpipe cleaners": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty (from breathing in drainpipe cleaner)", "Throat swelling (may also cause breathing difficulty)", "Severe change in acid level of blood (pH balance), which leads to damage in all of the body organs", "Loss of vision", "Severe pain in the throat", "Severe pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue", "Blood in the stool", "Burns and possible holes (perforation) in the\u00a0throat (esophagus)", "Severe abdominal pain", "Vomiting", "Vomiting blood", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure that develops rapidly", "Burns", "Holes (necrosis) in the skin or tissues underneath", "Irritation"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Diabetes - when you are sick": {"description": "Sick-day management - diabetes"}, "Do you have a drinking problem?": {"description": "Alcohol use; Alcohol abuse; Alcoholism"}, "Developmental milestones record": {"description": "See also:"}, "Dirt - swallowing": {"Symptoms": [], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Teach children not to eat dirt, and have them wash their hands after being outside."}, "Detergent poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Severe change in acid level of blood (pH balance), which leads to damage in all of the body organs", "Loss of vision", "Severe pain in the throat", "Severe pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue", "Blood in the stool", "Burns and possible holes in the\u00a0throat (esophagus)", "Severe abdominal pain", "Vomiting", "Vomiting blood", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure that develops rapidly", "Breathing difficulty (from breathing in the detergent)", "Throat swelling (may also cause breathing difficulty)", "Burns", "Holes (necrosis) in the skin or tissues underneath", "Irritation"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Denture problems": {"description": "Other denture tips:"}, "Diet after gastric banding ": {"description": "Your doctor, nurse, or dietitian will teach you about foods you can eat and foods you should avoid. It is very important to follow these diet guidelines."}, "Doxepin overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Airways and lungs \r\n\r\nBreathing slowed and labored. ", "Breathing slowed and labored", "Bladder and kidneys \r\n\r\nUrinary hesitancy\u00a0(difficulty starting the urinary stream and emptying the bladder)\u00a0\r\n . ", "Urinary hesitancy\u00a0(difficulty starting the urinary stream and emptying the bladder)\u00a0\r\n ", "Eyes, ears, nose, and throat \r\n\r\nBlurred vision, Ringing in the ears. ", "Blurred vision", "Ringing in the ears", "Heart and blood \r\n\r\nIrregular heartbeat (may be fatal)\r\n , Low blood pressure, Shock. ", "Irregular heartbeat (may be fatal)\r\n ", "Low blood pressure", "Shock", "Mouth, stomach, and intestinal tract \r\n\r\nConstipation, Dry mouth, Nausea, Unpleasant taste, Vomiting. ", "Constipation", "Dry mouth", "Nausea", "Unpleasant taste", "Vomiting", "Nervous system \r\n\r\nAgitation, Coma, Confusion, Convulsions, Drowsiness, Headache, Incoordination, Muscle rigidity, Restlessness, Seizures, Stupor (a lack of alertness). ", "Agitation", "Coma", "Confusion", "Convulsions", "Drowsiness", "Headache", "Incoordination", "Muscle rigidity", "Restlessness", "Seizures", "Stupor (a lack of alertness)", "Skin \r\n\r\nSkin that is unusually sensitive to sunlight (photosensitive). ", "Skin that is unusually sensitive to sunlight (photosensitive)"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Keep all medicines in child-proof containers and out of reach of children. Read all medicine labels and take only medicines that have been prescribed for you."}, "Dementia": {"description": "Dementia is a loss of brain function that occurs with certain diseases. It affects memory, thinking, language, judgment, and behavior.", "Symptoms": ["Emotional behavior or personality", "Language", "Memory", "Perception", "Thinking and judgment (cognitive skills) ", "Difficulty doing more than one task at a time", "Difficulty solving problems or making decisions", "Forgetting recent events or conversations", "Taking longer to do more difficult mental activities ", "Difficulty with tasks that take some thought, but that used to come easily, such as balancing a checkbook, playing games (such as bridge), and learning new information or routines", "Getting lost on familiar routes", "Language problems, such as trouble with the names of familiar objects", "Losing interest in things previously enjoyed, flat mood", "Misplacing items", "Personality changes and loss of social skills, which can lead to inappropriate behaviors ", "Change in sleep patterns, often waking up at night", "Difficulty with basic tasks, such as preparing meals, choosing proper clothing, or driving", "Forgetting details about current events", "Forgetting events in one's own life history, losing self-awareness", "Having hallucinations, arguments, striking out, and violent behavior", "Having delusions, depression, agitation", "More difficulty reading or writing", "Poor judgment and loss of ability to recognize danger", "Using the wrong word, not pronouncing words correctly, speaking in confusing sentences", "Withdrawing from social contact ", "Perform basic activities of daily living, such as eating, dressing, and bathing", "Recognize family members", "Understand language ", "Problems controlling bowel movements or urine", "Swallowing problems "], "Exams and Tests": "A skilled health care provider can often diagnose dementia using the following:Complete physical exam, including nervous system exam, Asking about the person's medical history and symptoms, Mental function tests (mental status examination) . Other tests may be ordered to find out if other problems may be causing dementia or making it worse. These conditions include:Anemia, Brain tumor, Chronic infection, Intoxication from medications, Severe depression, Thyroid disease, Vitamin deficiency. The following tests and procedures may be done:B12 level, Blood ammonia levels, Blood chemistry (chem-20), Blood gas analysis, Cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) analysis, Drug or alcohol levels (toxicology screen), Electroencephalograph (EEG), Head CT, Mental status test, MRI of head, Thyroid function tests, including thyroid stimulating hormone, Thyroid stimulating hormone level, Urinalysis. ", "Causes": "Dementia usually occurs in older age. It is rare in people under age 60. The risk of dementia increases as a person gets older.Most types of dementia are nonreversible (degenerative). Nonreversible means the changes in the brain that are causing the dementia cannot be stopped or turned back. Alzheimer disease is the most common type of dementia.Another common type of dementia is vascular dementia. It is caused by many small strokes.Lewy body disease is a common cause of dementia in the elderly. People with this condition have abnormal protein structures in certain areas of the brain.The following medical conditions can also lead to dementia:Huntington disease, Brain injury, Multiple sclerosis, Infections such as HIV/AIDS, syphilis,\u00a0and Lyme disease, Parkinson disease, Pick disease, Progressive supranuclear palsy. Some causes of dementia may be stopped or reversed if they are found soon enough, including:Brain injury, Brain tumors, Chronic alcohol abuse, Changes in blood sugar, sodium, and calcium levels (dementia due to metabolic causes), Low vitamin B12 level, Normal pressure hydrocephalus, Use of certain medicines, including cimetidine and some cholesterol drugs . ", "Prevention": "Most causes of dementia are not preventable.The risk of vascular dementia may be reduced by preventing strokes through:Eating healthy foods, Exercising, Quitting smoking, Controlling high blood pressure, Managing diabetes. ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the condition causing the dementia. Some people may need to stay in the hospital for a short time.Sometimes dementia medicine can make a patient's confusion worse. Stopping or changing these medicines is part of the treatment.Certain mental exercises can help with dementia.Treating conditions that can lead to confusion often greatly improve mental function. Such conditions include:Anemia, Congestive heart failure, Decreased blood oxygen (hypoxia), Depression, Heart failure, Infections, Nutritional disorders, Thyroid disorders . Medicines may be used to:Slow the rate at which symptoms get worse, though improvement with these drugs may be small, Control problems with behavior, such as loss of judgment or confusion. "}, "Diabetic hyperglycemic hyperosmolar syndrome": {"description": "Diabetic hyperglycemic hyperosmolar syndrome (HHS) is a complication of type 2 diabetes. It involves extremely high blood sugar (glucose) levels without the presence of ketones. Ketones are waste products of fat breakdown.", "Possible Complications": "Acute circulatory collapse (shock), Blood clot formation, Brain swelling (cerebral edema), Increased blood acid levels (lactic acidosis). ", "Symptoms": ["Coma", "Confusion", "Convulsions", "Dry mouth, dry tongue", "Fever", "Increased thirst", "Increased urination (at the beginning of the syndrome)", "Lethargy", "Nausea", "Weakness", "Weight loss ", "Loss of feeling or function of muscles", "Problems with movement", "Speech impairment "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will examine you and ask about your symptoms and medical history. The exam may show that you have:\u00a0Extreme dehydration, Fever higher than 100.4\u00b0 Fahrenheit, Increased heart rate, Low systolic blood pressure . Test that may be done include:Blood\u00a0osmolarity (concentration), BUN and creatinine levels, Blood sodium level, Ketone test, Blood glucose. Evaluation for possible causes may include:Blood cultures, Chest x-ray, Electrocardiogram (ECG), Urinalysis. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to correct the dehydration. This will improve the blood pressure, urine output, and circulation.Fluids and potassium will be given through a vein (intravenously). High glucose level is treated with insulin given through a vein.", "Prevention": "Controlling type 2 diabetes and recognizing the early signs of dehydration and infection can help prevent this condition.", "Causes": "Diabetic hyperglycemic hyperosmolar syndrome is a condition of:Extremely high blood sugar (glucose) level, Extreme lack of water (dehydration), Decreased consciousness (in many cases). Buildup of ketones in the body (ketoacidosis) may also occur.\u00a0But it is unusual and is often mild compared with diabetic ketoacidosis. This condition is usually seen in people with type 2 diabetes who don't have their diabetes under control. It may also occur in those who have not been diagnosed with diabetes. The condition may be brought on by:Infection, Other illness, such as heart attack or stroke, Medicines that decrease the effect of insulin in the body, Medicines or conditions that\u00a0increase fluid loss . Normally, the kidneys try to make up for\u00a0a high glucose level in the blood by allowing the extra glucose to leave the body in the urine. But this also causes the body\u00a0to lose water. If you do not drink enough water, or you drink fluids that contain sugar and keep eating foods with carbohydrates, the kidneys can no longer get rid of the extra glucose. As a result, the glucose level in\u00a0your blood can become very high. The loss of water (dehydration) also makes the blood more concentrated than normal. This is called hyperosmolarity. It\u00a0is a condition in which the blood has a high concentration of salt (sodium), glucose, and other substances that normally cause water to move into the bloodstream. This draws the water out of the body's other organs, including the brain. Hyperosmolarity creates a cycle of increasing blood glucose levels and dehydration.Risk factors include:A stressful event such as infection, heart attack, stroke, or recent surgery, Congestive heart failure, Impaired thirst, Limited access to water (especially in patients with dementia or who are bedbound), Older age, Poor kidney function, Poor management of diabetes -- not following the treatment plan as directed, Stopping insulin or other medications that lower glucose levels. "}, "Diabetes - taking care of your feet": {"description": "Diabetes - foot care - self-care"}, "Deciding to have knee or hip replacement": {"description": "Surgery may or may not be the right choice for you. Only careful discussion and thought can help you make a decision."}, "Deep breathing after surgery": {"description": "A device called an incentive spirometer can help you take deep breaths correctly. If you do not have this device, you can still practice deep breathing on your own."}, "Depression - older adults": {"Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will examine you and ask questions about your medical history and symptoms. Blood and urine tests may be done to look for a physical illness. You may be referred to a mental health specialist to help with diagnosis and treatment. ", "description": "Depression in older adults is a widespread problem, but it is not a normal part of aging. It is\u00a0often not recognized or treated.", "Causes": "In older adults, life changes can increase the risk for depression or make existing depression worse. Some of these changes are:A move from home, such as to a retirement facility, Chronic illness or pain, Children moving away, Spouse or close friends passing away, Loss of independence (for example, problems getting around or caring for oneself) . Depression can also be related to a physical illness, such as:Thyroid disorders, Parkinson disease, Heart disease, Cancer, Stroke, Dementia (such as Alzheimer disease) . Overuse of alcohol or certain medicines (such as sleep aids) can make depression worse. ", "Treatment": "The first steps of treatment are to:Treat any illness that may be causing the symptoms, Stop taking any medications that may be making symptoms worse, Avoid alcohol and sleep aids . If these steps do not help, medicines to treat depression and talk therapy often help.Doctors often prescribe lower doses of antidepressants to older people, and increase the dose more slowly than in younger adults.To better manage depression at home, you\u00a0should:Exercise regularly, if your doctor says it is ok., Surround yourself with caring, positive people and do fun activities., Learn good sleep habits., Learn to watch for the early signs of depression, and know how to react if these occur., Drink less alcohol and do not use\u00a0illegal drugs., Talk about your feelings with someone\u00a0you trust., Take medications correctly and discuss any side effects with your doctor. . "}, "Deciding about treatments that prolong life": {"description": "Treatments to extend life can include the use of machines. This equipment does the work of the body organ, such as:"}, "Dialysis - peritoneal": {"description": "This article focuses on peritoneal dialysis."}, "Do-not-resuscitate order": {"description": "No code; End-of-life; Do not resuscitate; Do not resuscitate order; DNR; DNR order"}, "Diastasis recti": {"description": "Diastasis recti is a separation between the left and right side of the rectus abdominis muscle. This muscle covers the front surface of the belly area.", "Possible Complications": "In general, complications only result when a hernia develops.", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor can diagnose this condition with a physical exam.\r\n", "Treatment": "No treatment is needed for pregnant women with this condition.\r\nIn infants, the rectus abdominis muscles continue. The diastasis recti will disappear over time. Surgery may be needed if the baby develops a\r\nhernia that becomes trapped in the space between the muscles.\r\n", "Causes": "Diastasis recti is a common in newborns. It is seen most frequently in premature and African American infants.Pregnant women may develop the condition because of increased tension on the abdominal wall. The risk is higher if with multiple births or many pregnancies.Women who are 12 or more weeks pregnant should not do exercises that stress the abdomen. This may worsen the condition."}, "D and C": {"description": "D and C is a procedure to scrape and collect the tissue (endometrium) from inside the uterus."}, "Developmental milestones record - 4 months": {"description": "Typical 4-month-old infants are expected to develop certain physical and mental skills. These skills are called milestones."}, "Diabetes insipidus": {"description": "Diabetes insipidus is an uncommon condition in which the kidneys are unable to prevent the excretion of water.", "Possible Complications": "If your body's thirst control is normal and you drink enough fluids, there are no significant effects on body fluid or salt balance.Not drinking enough fluids can lead to dehydration and electrolyte imbalance.If DI is treated with vasopressin and your body's thirst control is not normal, drinking more fluids than your body needs can cause dangerous electrolyte imbalance. ", "Symptoms": ["Excessive thirst that may be intense or uncontrollable, usually with the need to drink large amounts of water or craving for ice water", "Excessive urine volume", "Excessive urination, often needing to urinate every hour throughout the day and night "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will ask about your medical history and symptoms.Tests that may be ordered include:Blood sodium and osmolarity, Desmopressin (DDAVP) challenge, MRI of the head, Urinalysis, Urine concentration, Urine output . ", "Treatment": "The cause of the underlying condition will be treated when possible.Central diabetes insipidus may be controlled with vasopressin (desmopressin, DDAVP). You take vasopressin as either an injection, a nasal spray, or tablets.If nephrogenic DI is caused by medication, stopping the medication may help restore normal kidney function. But with some medications, such as lithium, after many years of use, nephrogenic DI can be permanent.Hereditary nephrogenic DI and lithium-induced nephrogenic DI are treated by drinking enough fluids to match urine output. Medicines that lower urine output also need to be taken. Nephrogenic DI is treated with anti-inflammatory medicines and diuretics (water pills).", "Causes": "During the day, your kidneys filter all your blood many times. Normally, most of the water is reabsorbed, and only a small amount of concentrated urine is excreted. DI occurs when the kidneys cannot concentrate the urine normally, and a large amount of dilute urine is excreted. The amount of water excreted in the urine is controlled by antidiuretic hormone (ADH). ADH is also called vasopressin. ADH is produced in a part of the brain called the hypothalamus. It is then stored and released from the pituitary gland. This is a small gland at the base of the brain.DI caused by a lack of ADH is called central diabetes insipidus. When DI is caused by a failure of the kidneys to respond to ADH, the condition is called nephrogenic diabetes insipidus.Central diabetes insipidus can be caused by damage to the hypothalamus or pituitary gland as a result of:Genetic problems, Head injury, Infection, Loss of blood supply to the gland, Surgery, Tumor . Nephrogenic DI involves a defect in the kidneys. As a result, the kidneys do not respond to ADH. Like central DI, nephrogenic DI is very rare. Nephrogenic DI may be caused by:Certain drugs (such as lithium), Genetic problems, High level of calcium in the body (hypercalcemia), Kidney disease (such as polycystic kidney disease) . "}}